As a young girl between five to seven years of age I’d been sexually abused by a paternal uncle; following several years of a dark, tortuous existence, I finally went into therapy. It was seven years later when I acquired enough nerve to put onto paper the impact incest had on me.
Reaching this milestone also means that I have to give 2 weeks notice when I leave rather than the one.
Animals fending off predators to protect young
I appetite I was Spyro. This may be affiliated to the actuality that if I was little and anticipation I could in actuality be annihilation I capital if I grew up, I capital to be a dragon. Spyro is the dragon of all dragons. Accepting able to fly about and breathe both blaze and ice is aloft awesome.
Tonight while being in the midst of frustration about my internet not working, I came across an amazing giveaway by Courtney at Miss. Third Grade. I have been following Courtney's blog since this summer and am so inspired by her adventures as a first year 3rd grade teacher. After all, that is exactly where I hope to be this time next year! I was so excited to see that she was doing a giveaway of three wonderful books that she received from Scholastic, but already owns! If you know me at all, you know that I LOVE LOVE LOVE children's literature and will read anything and everything I can get my hands on. I have been collecting (spending all of my money) on children's books for the last few months in hopes of creating the BEST classroom library possible for my students! I would love to add three new additions to my collection!
Courtney Lockwood is a man that wakes up after a car accident with no idea who he is or why he darted in front of a car. He has nothing in common with his family and his amnesia covers all areas, including his attitude.
At five in the afternoon the curtains close, the floor has been swept, the potatoes are boiling and it will be time for everyone to come home!
27. Teddy Wayne "Kapitoil"
Good to know. I could have used a handful today.
Who wouldn't like to have a 457 page guide written by almost 50 experts on what to buy for resale when you are out shopping garage sales, thrift stores, flea markets, and estate sales? I mean really, why hasn't a book like this been put together before now?!?! Lucky for us, the amazing Janelle Elms from OSI Rockstars had the idea and made it happen - and it is going to be released very soon!
Today is my friend Hsing's birthday, and since we both love Hello Kitty, I wanted to make her Hello Kitty cupcakes. Last year I made her a Hello Kitty ice cream cake - chocolate cake with homemade mint oreo ice cream (a post is in the works on that one!), so this year I wanted to do something totally different.
One year around Valentine's Day, my sister and I commissioned Mom to make some heart shaped sugar cookies that we could all turn into conversation hearts. They turned out so cute, and now we love to make them during February as a fun way to celebrate Valentine's Day. You can keep them in the family, or wrap them up for friends and neighbors. Surely, you won't be disappointed. I hope that you will enjoy this recipe as much as our family does.
closet must-have : a classic black tube maxi dress! u know how hard it is when all you want to wear is just a minimalist yet classy dress? this classic black dress is the answer to my prayers! full black with vertical seam lines - flattering to all bodyshapes, love how the long dress drapes down, not to heavy with the subtle flares. and what stole my heart, are the details at the back of the dress! it has a back-mermaid flair with a little train effect (like those in wedding gowns, u know, hehe). i love every bit of it. (best of all it's at a steal price of RM58!)
so many of them when I was at college! Like a good omelette, a soufflé is the
In the opening scenes of Satyajit Ray's flawed, yet intimately haunting, The Music Room (1958), an aging Bengali feudal landlord (zamindar), Biswambhar Roy (Chhabi Biswas), sits with his back to us in a large chair on the roof of his dilapidated mansion. He puffs away on his hookah, lost in time, while time is clearly running out on his era of wealth and power. Set in the late 1920s, the zamindar's only connection to the comforts and pleasures of his class privilege is the music concerts he presents in his home. The music room, which holds within it the fleeting power of nostalgia, transports Roy from the afflictions of time to the more nobler moments in his past, while his present life decays around him. (It is perhaps a rich irony, not lost here, that it was the feudal classes, so influenced by the West, that actually kept Indian classical music alive.)
If you are like us and living in the midst of cicada hell, you have my sympathy. If you are not, you are very, very lucky. Here in Central Illinois, we have our once-every-thirteen-years visit from the cicadas. They are disgusting creatures. There are billions and billions of them. They are huge—about 1 inch long and extremely ugly. They don’t bite or sting (thank God!) but they are terribly loud and they fly right into you. They come out of the ground, mature, mate, lay eggs and die. Then their rotting carcasses start to stink. Yuck. Just yuck. Mowing the yard is a little step into hell for me. They are attracted to the hum of the mower and they just go crazy. I walked around my yard and took some pictures.
It's J.A. Konrath's greatest heroine versus Blake Crouch's greatest villain in Stirred, the stunning conclusion to both Konrath's Lt. Jacqueline "Jack" Daniels thriller series and Crouch's Andrew Z. Thomas series.
I was at the cinema yesterday to watch "Ghost Rider 2". It was a per-premiere, a preview, sponsored by the magazine consol.at. Sometimes it's really great to have nerd friends because nerd friends get tickets to previews :D
After which the random touch. The piece
Boston Beer Company (Samuel Adams) Samuel Adams Utopias
It's quite similar to Chanel Nouvelle Vague. From swatches I've seen, Lagoon has a tiny bit more of a green tinge to it but they're close enough for me.
We always claim to be for Jesus and no other, but we continue to doubt the little things that make him God. If you are indeed a child of God, no matter what anyone says or does to you, your faith in your God must remain and no one will be able to take you away from Him. Therefore if you waive in faith, then you’re not truly Jesus’s own.
(Seriously, I haven't seen an alarm clock since April 4th!!!!)
Cheryl: Generally speaking, faith based books are going to appeal to believers. There are some that reach out to non-believers, but overall we’re preaching to the choir. There’s nothing wrong with that. If our ministries are blessed by God, then we are reaching out to our brothers and sisters in Chris, and sharing the Good News while we entertain them.
- r. bowie, neath, s.wales, 17/2/2012 20:12
I was running the other evening, listening to the Beastie Boys when the song Sure Shot started playing that says "Because you can't you won't and you don't stop". I was running up a hill (a HILL!) and kept repeating that line in my head like a ticking clock or a dripping faucet. It worked. I didn't stop as soon as I felt tired, I kept going for what felt like a long time, but in reality was probably only 30 seconds.
Up 3rd access down 1st access. Lingered too long on the summit and ended up stumbling through darkness on the bottom half of the mountain.
I'm not really off to school, but this outfit made me feel like I was. Or, at least made me look like an overgrown kid. That's cool. I wore this the week before last to work, then again on my weekend trip to New York. I was very comfortable, and very warm, which lately is all that matters. I've been amping up my thrifting these days, I've fallen in love with vintage and second hand again after a rather fruitless last few months in Massachusetts. Either way, I've found some great stuff that I can't wait to share with you all, along with some thrifting tips!
Humming softly… Stirring in your ear, tickling at your cochlea.
Luis Pérez-Sala, Team Principal: “We’re very thankful towards Jean Todt for having the courtesy of coming to visit us and we’re delighted to have received him and shown him the new facilities. It was important for him to come and see it personally because on the track all you can see are the cars. You can explain everything that’s behind the scenes but nothing compares to seeing it and experiencing it firsthand to understand the work that is being done. It also gives a chance to explain him the team’s current project and plans to grow in the future. That growth that we’re currently experiencing and will continue to do so is what, with time, will translate into an improvement on the track. I also want to thank the rest of the FIA members, Carlos Gracia and the Spanish Federation, the RACC and the RACE for joining us and I’m very proud that they are also a part of this”.
In high school I was completely in love with horror and science fiction writing, and spent time with H.G. Wells, Isaac Asimov, and the aforementioned King.
St. Gerard Miles
Ted Andrews Animal Speak (1993) Llewellyn
Gabie drives a Mini Cooper. She also works part time as a delivery girl at Pete’s Pizza. One night, Kayla—another delivery girl—goes missing. To her horror, Gabie learns that the supposed kidnapper had asked if the girl in the Mini Cooper was working that night. Gabie can’t move beyond the fact that Kayla’s fate was really meant for her, and she becomes obsessed with finding Kayla. She teams up with Drew, who also works at Pete’s. Together, they set out to prove that Kayla isn’t dead—and to find her
(3) Because bribing the wealthy for their loyalty buys their economic support (but don’t tell anyone, it’s supposed to be a secret!)
Find INHALE at:
The chief reason lies in our continuing love affair with banking and financial services, which still provide a large slice of our tax revenues. From the late Eighties onwards, governments have viewed these banks — which arrange and finance all these overseas deals — as a sort of universal economic panacea.
You don't even need to steal anything. Ursula Nevin slept through the riots but next day was wearing a pair of shorts looted by her flatmate. She just got five months in jail, away from her two young children.
My mother was a fascinating woman who left me a real mix of personal treasures. As a young adult she had spent a lot of time living in Paris and her war work had her based there doing things that she never talked about. However years later an American friend of hers told me that she had been involved with the Resistance, something my mother always refused to corroborate. There's nothing more alluring than mystery, don't you think?
Maybe outside there's
Because owls have stormed the craft world this past year,
Exact population figures in Britain are hard to come by. The authorities maintain the total number is around 60 million, but no one really knows. The Independent newspaper suggested the population could already be as high as 77 million, based on supermarket food sales, a figure borne out by the76 million National Insurance cards in existence, which are essential if you wish to work or draw benefits. In other words, some 16-17 million people unaccounted for.
Oct 7 – Club Infinity – Buffalo, NY (W/Cobra Starship)
*God planned it from all eternity! (Say this to anyone who asks you at church. They should totally know better.)
Me: (rolling my eyes) Ummm nope. We had a conversation on the way to the hospital. We had James picked out already but hadn't chosen a middle name but decided on Spencer as we were driving. Of course it didn't matter in the end anyway.
As ever the sharing of safety knowledge is priceless!
That gentle insistence that kept me watching stems from its opening scene, I think, in which a body is found floating in a river. It promises ominous things, things that tends to convert Lee's quiet scenes into menacing ones. The movie isn't a thriller, though, and the emotions it seeks to elicit aren't excitement. There is no adrenalin rush here. This is mainly a character study.
Basically I cut the wood to the length I wanted the table to be, glued the edges, butted the sides together and clamped the whole thing together for a couple of days - I omitted the clamping last time which I would never do again.
“After many years of hard work by our development team and months of beta testing by hundreds of thousands of dedicated players around the world, we’re now in the homestretch,” explained Mike Morhaime, the president of Blizzard Entertainment. “We look forward to putting the final polish on Diablo 3 over the next two months and delivering the ultimate action-RPG experience to gamers worldwide starting on May 15.”
Here’s the Fanny Brice sequence:
I hope everyone is having a wonderful Sunday and a fun Halloween. We are meeting up with Gigi and Pop Pop for dinner and then heading to the Zoo Boo this evening. I will be sure to share pictures of it soon and of Caden's bday party yesterday.
Remember, you can share everyday to receive an extra entry, BUT you must comment back letting me know you shared so I can keep track of the entries. All entries will be validated. Contest will end May 7th at 11:50 Central time. I have the Giveaway Prize on hand and will email winner within 24 hours of winner selection.
Applications will be accepted from a wide range of organisations including community groups, heritage organisations and charities. The application process is simple:
My first pregnancy was a surprise. A big one. Before I had a chance to wrap my head around it, it was gone and I was left feeling upset but slightly relieved. I was young, and I knew my partner wasn't my 'forever', so not being tied to him for the rest of my life was what I felt relieved about. I also felt guilty. Like my baby knew I wasn't jumping for joy and that's why I lost it. Mother guilt kicks in at conception.
This building has housed a few different restaurants over the years, although they have always been Italian ones in my memory. From the outside it's a very attractive place with red awnings and plenty of outdoor tables.
I promise I will get pictures posted in the next day or so. I am wrapping up a fundraiser tomorrow and will be back on track right after. See you in April
That silence was me falling off the end of the earth, which, purely statistically and the South African politicians alone providing proof aplenty of this, on the tip of this here continent I inhabit is a much more common occurrence than one might think. Unlike the politicians though, I fell gloriously, and right into the mix of family and great friends, lions (who again refused to eat me - Are they not into pickled things or what is this aversion all about? Am I not good enough?), windy and not so much beaches with white, warm sand, French champagne at its nose-tickling best, farting rhinos (both actual as well as a few more commonly referred to as my brothers), golf, great wine at great restaurants, dolphins, much too much wine at much too many vineyards, talk, discussions, penguins, chatter, smells of the sea and one unfortunate giraffe carcass, one severely flat mountain at sunset, and real, fleshy people, places, things, coffee, and some more of that wine, in random locations this time though.
One of the things I remember most about her was how she walked. Stiff and robotic. Every movement was excruciatingly rigid. Shortly after meeting her, I remember telling my mother this girl moved like a character in a film I'd recently seen. That character's name was C3P0.
This was my first Jacobson, and I was a tad bit underwhelmed. I was really anticipating something gripping, and it wasn't. It is the second in the series, so I could have missed some vital info from the first, but I think it should have been strong enough without it. It had a cliffhanger ending, so naturally I'm left wondering, but unfortunately, I don't have a stronger desire to pick up the next book. Wish I did!
However, as is often the case where human universals are concerned, looking to similar behaviors in other animals can be especially instructive. For example, a study that has just been released in the American Journal of Primatology has captured the most complete process to date of what could only be described as mourning behavior in nonhuman primates. Katherine Cronin and colleagues at the Max Planck Institute, Gonzaga University, and the Chimfunshi Wildlife Orphanage Trust in Zambia have documented a case where a chimpanzee mother faced what for most of us would be an unthinkable horror: the death of her child.
7:30 pm – 10 pm Evening on your own in the Alberta capital! Dinner at La Boheme in Highlands for those who wish to attend
I don't remember, but I think it only took maybe 2-3 weeks to get the caulk sample. And it's easy to join BlogHer! Just click HERE, then click on "join us" toward the top right corner and sign up. TaDa!
I think this is when I started to go a little nuts.
So back when I was dating Da Man, who would later become Da husband, we went out with a bunch of friends to a bar/nightclub. Da Man took his usual position by the bar while my girlfriends and I took to the dance floor. As I was dancing, a man walked by and grabbed my arm and copped a cheap feel of my left breast. Now I'm not what you call a particularly well endowed type of girl. And I'm pretty sure my left side is actually smaller than my right. So it isn't that easy to accidentally feel me up. If a guy wants to cop a feel, there needs to be some intent, if you know what I mean. So the raging feminist in me lost her mind and in crazy, self-righteous anger, began to punch the guy as hard as she could, and as many times as she could, knocking him down, and making him let go of her. Da Man reckons I hit that guy at least 10 times before he hit the ground.
An expat should be open to and make new friends constantly.
3. Make an blogpost on your own blog with an link to this blog.
Have you ever made a bucket list? My bucket list is constantly expanding the more I tick as completed.
For my Advanced Poetry Writing Course this fall, I’m doing a unit on traditional Chinese women’s poetry to focus primarily on image. My work has undoubtedly been influenced by traditional Chinese poetics—the lack of “I”, the melancholy (however posed), the images (the concrete ground), a conscience of the natural world, poetry “to the tune of”—so thoroughly indebted to song—like the poems of the Song dynasty.
An individual Non-smokers personal preference for a “Smoke Free” environment is irrelevant to the business and property owner that has spent their time, energy and resources in designing an environment that is specifically aimed at enticing citizens that smoke into patronizing their establishments. Non-Smoker’s are always welcome of course, but their personal preferences end at the front door of businesses where smoking is obviously permitted, since they are aware that to cross that threshold of their own volition means they would be assuming personal responsibility for their actions. Fortunately for them in a Free Society they have the right to do so, but make no mistake, by doing so they are ignoring their own personal preference for a Smoke Free environment. How is this even remotely the responsibility of those business owners?
for a little adventure...
But when it comes time to use that original amount of money for the project of which it was intended months or years later, the capital gains (profits) of that supposedly dormant money are separated from the original amount placed into the “holding account” and stay in the governments discretionary investment coffers and are then reinvested not for the benefit of the people, but for the wealth and profit of the corporate government. The problem and the inherent crime here is this – that profit is no longer considered tax-payer (public) owned money, since it was earned by investment or by accrued interest. That “extra money” goes elsewhere… mainly into other investments or funds which grease the pockets of the “in the know” politicians and corporations and other people and groups involved. Some open what are called “self insurance funds” and then draw dividends for themselves and their fellow conspirators for the rest of their political careers by insuring themselves with their own insurance funds. And the cycle goes on and on and on and on… and has for the last 70 years. And it has now reached the point where government owns it all!
Deputies were dispatched to an In & Out Party Store in the 600 block of University about 10:40 p.m. Wednesday where a clerk said a man, armed with a propane torch and lighter, had robbed the store
I hope you had a wonderful holiday season and have started the new year on a bright, but spooky note! I want to share one more photo with you. This one was taken on our move/ road-trip across the country. It's a huge mansion that will make its way into one of my future paintings, which will commence soon! Happy Hauntings!
I had been noodling over this idea for a while. Slowly it came into focus.
While the oil is heating, preheat the oven to 350º. After the wings have finished marinating for a couple of hours, spread them out on a baking tray, along with any liquid from the marinade, and bake for 15-20 minutes, until just about cooked through. Remove from the oven and let cool slightly.
Supporting casts:
It was then I came to recognize my inability to properly express the various feelings I had experienced throughout my life and that surprised me, because I always have something to say. But these events in my life were extraordinary and the emotions they generated were powerful, leaving me to examine what I thought were capable writing abilities
its always sad at the end of a candy to see a lot of people remove my blog.
There I was Sunday, minding my own business, sitting on the balcony of my brother-in-law's Panama condo looking out over the infinity pools and ocean ruminating about what I enjoyed best about my two week trip to Panama.
Birthday pictures from Christian's fabulous Mickey Party will be coming, they are SO cute :)~
I pushed her off and jumped up. My pants got a little tighter.
When Carnegie tries to pressure Eli into giving him the Book, he thinks he has left Eli no choice but to comply. But Eli responds, “There’s always a choice.”
They buried my body, they thought I was gone
Wet on skin: Oh, there’s the sugared incense. It’s a little plastic-y at this point but the black coconut and patchouli is making an appearance.
Who better to demonstrate this than someone famous for connecting ideas to create innovation!
He goes on to state, and I quote:
M: Are you trying to make a go of being a musician?
1 x 1059PKBK Sexy Bra Set = RM22.50
EODTC Blog (eodtcblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Have been annoy'd much by my neighbors
Still, I had that two hours – I danced with the angels for brief moment (actually I walked with a tough paranormal P.I. – pahtatoe – potaytoe)
The Diary of Anne Frank – 27
The episodes are only 20 minutes long, and last night I actually watched around four of them back to back for mood as I was working on my Tegel Manor material. This is going to be a stormy weekend in Southern California, so I plan to watch a lot of DS. I understand that in upcoming episodes there will be homage’s to werewolves, Frankenstein, and even Rider’s “She.” Time travel, parallel universes, and “The Levianthans,” old dark gods in the HP Lovecraft mold, are going to be featured as well.
This pretty little girl came down with what we believe to be Wry Neck or Crookneck.
caused by an attack as
– Once past that goal, we watch for the many milestones of infanthood. We can’t wait for them talk, walk, and potty train.
19 October
So, not a bad end to the week.
Page 739. 'Snakebite' entry. Did you know that "Snakebite is a mixture of lager and alcoholic cider that is sometimes euphamistically referred to as a 'beer cocktail"?
Yikes. Where is my husband when I need him? I don’t deal well with critters.
The Process
Toss the ingredients together in a bowl, and pour the mixture into your pie dish.
that's kinda huge.
"Nico Gomez And His Afro Percussion Inc.- Ritual -1971 Belgium":
Without further ado here is the full list of events for Newcastle craft beer week in the last week of November 2011!! Woohoo!
Just as I don't know how I found the grocery store, I have no idea how I eventually ended up back at my hotel. I don't think anyone even knew I was gone.
Three factors in my life
On the other hand, you might find yourself drawn to the sensate: videos, magazines with photos, beautiful artwork, movies, music, sculpting, painting, being with people, dancing, gardening, walking, and other kinesthetic forms of expression. You may search for spiritual content, even science fiction. Advice: You may discover that if you allow your heart and your right brain to lead you, the left will then be activated appropriately to support you. And someday we will be well-balanced, using both hemispheres with mastery.
(By the way, you can only be paid for your art by webcam auctioning your fiance’s daughter and various items, often double-selling them by poorly-organized mistake. In another acclaimed singer’s apartment, where you’re staying for free on another continent. Lady Gaga’s bad.)
So far this much is done on one design although the suggested colors are a bit different but I used what I had in my stash.
I won't steal their post, but wander over and take a look.
Jaded fragments of a pain
Ten years provides a lot of perspective. When I celebrate my thirtieth birthday we will have officially been at war with the Taliban for a decade. How do I feel about that? I don't know, in all honesty. I sit in the aftermath of Anders Behring Brievik's attack on Oslo and wonder. What could have been different? Could our reaction have been moderated, even in the face of such an audacious attack? What have we given up in the name of security? These are all questions I cannot answer; though I feel now, later, I am better prepared and informed to consider them honestly.
Michael Marshall Smith – Later
And that’s why I’m not a fan of high maintenance people. They’re like living with a soap opera. There’s so much “drama”, and it is, to quote the Bard, a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing.
Meanwhile, back at the GOP ranch, people are clamoring for Condi Rice to be the vice-presidential nominee. That might be a good thing, having an unintended effect. It might finally separate the brain-dead 'respectables' from the few sane people who still, mysteriously, cling to the GOP.
This year, we lost a lot of games, most of them by more than 10 points, and I think the worst was around 40-50 points. It was painful to watch them, and a lot of my friends who are diehard Blazer fans even quit watching them and went for other teams. Now that’s saying something about our team, and it’s not good at all. Anyway, so I started analyzing a few players individually and our team as a whole and have come up with what I think are very well educated opinions.
Excuses, excuses, excuses. Chips, time, fear of looking like a phony. I stuffed a few chips in my mouth, and exchanged chips for booklet. Rather awkwardly, juggling bag, scooter, and my booklet I approached. First I tried giving her the zippy version, fast-and-punchy, in-and-out, drop-and-run, but she kept talking back!! I opted for sacrificing hot chips, and gave it a decent go. Before I knew it, I was down the road eating cold chips, but it was worth it. I left the results to God, and moved on. I gave what little I had, an awkward, simple, distracted tale about Jesus, who had changed my life.
Mrs. Rachel watched the kids, and they did great! Oh, one other thing about the evening--we ended up getting FREE street parking for both the show and for dinner. If you know about parking in downtown Atlanta, this is no small feat! Our dinner parking was actually right by the door of the restaurant! Way to go, Tanna!
Add the stock (I like to use Marigold Organic Swiss Vegetable Bouillon) to the vegetables, swish it around with a wooden spoon and then transfer the lot into a large saucepan. Add the basil leaves and bring to the boil, lower the heat and cook for a further minute or two and then take it off the heat and liquidise (Nigel’s recipe says to leave a couple of handfulls of tomatoes and red pepper behind and chop this finely by hand for a more textured soup).
An illusion it’s just not true
Clyde
An upcycled girl's dress from Bullfrogs 'N' Fireflies ($75 value)
We expect that It's Spring will be good news both to J Rabbit and to the audience :)
HOUSING MARKET HEALING
So I was stumbling around blogland drinking coffee and recuperating from eating grilled things and blowing stuff up― which, by the way, is exactly how ‘Merica wants us to celebrate its birthday. If that’s not what you did than you clearly hate ‘Merica (and by default, you must hate me, cheetohs, PBR and everything else that makes this country kickass too, in which case you can just move along). Anyhoo, I found myself over at Proflike's place. As I rooted around in the bushes looking for unexploded bottle rockets and unopened beers I found this meme. Seeing as how I can’t grill it, explode it or use it to intoxicate myself, I may as well post it. I’ve simplified it a bit, but hey, I’m curious. Don’t be shy. Just answer the damn questions…I’ll go make another pot of coffee. Cream? Sugar? Whiskey?
612 D-III/23/1971. “Procès des 7 de Chicago.” Forum Droit-Actualité, Université de Montreal, Montreal, Quebec.
I was very skeptical here. The early previews looked ridiculous and after Iron Man 2 I really can’t stand Tony Stark. But with Joss Whedon being the one in charge here I know he will pull through. My views finally changed after the newest trailer. This is the film I was hoping for and this is why it is higher than Dark Knight Rises. The marketing here is showing me the footage to make me excited and now, I am excited. I love these characters and am interested to see them play off each other. This will be a great start into the summer.
Even when it's terrible
1/2 cup chopped fresh basil
In response Miss Allen said she would “never ever hurt” any of her animals and added she honestly thought the foul smell coming from dog was being caused by an earlier ear infection it had suffered, for which she had taken the dog to the vets a month previously.
I followed the pattern except for the following changes
Founder's own review of the beer is pretty close to reality: 'Dirty Bastard is complex in the finish with hints of smoke and peat paired with a malty richness, finalized with a good bit of hop attitude. This beer "ain't fer the wee lads".'
But I'm still around. I have had this dreaded lurgy which i thought i had beaten , but in truth it was just lulling me into a false sense of security before it pounded me with about round 3 or 4 I think.
"Relvin! To me!" Taslin's voice, wild and high, was almost visible as the Sherim thrummed with harmonic echoes. The Axtli blocked any view that might have told him whether Dora was outside by the fire. He backpedalled, still close to falling, while the Axtli's spines stretched, reached.
Let's dissect what this is shall we? We're talking about a navy blue cardigan with some white embroidered lines, stars and a few seed beads. I took one look at it and immediately thought, "I can definitely make that!"
One of City Year Chicago’s very own was a winner in City Year’s first ever art competition, The Art of Idealism! Vy Nguyen’s art was one of 24 selected from over 400 submissions to the contest. As a winner, Vy’s artwork will appear in an upcoming Founding Stories hardbound book and she will also receive a paint kit (acrylic or watercolor) from Artist & Craftsman Supply, one Copic sketch marker, and stationary/gift set.
And this is brought to you by Corona Extra, the No.1 Mexican Beer in Las-Carretes, Ampang. My advice to my lovely readers is to read this when you are feeling full. Not advisable during midnight or anytime feeling hungry. Reason? I am actually hungry right now when writing this post and the following photos just made me got even hungrier fml
“Hey, you seem kind of out of it, Brooks. You should come with me and Wilson for a drink”
This is timely information for us, as we have always spent a great deal of our expendable income on vacations and entertainment. It also reflects our lifestyle, in which we drive old cars and do not spend very much money on our house.
When the chicken was done, I put it on a plate and shredded it. It shredded beautifully. It fell apart on its own as I was removing it from the crock pot. I put it back in the crock pot with the liquid and spices.
In a medium bowl, stir together crushed vanilla wafers and butter until blended. Firmly press on bottom and up the sides of a 9-inch pie plate.
"Hi Flore this is Edouard, tell me everything about tonight because I'm coming, my manager wants to meet you !"
Here's a video for you're listening pleasure.
This is a most interesting science magazine article about perfect pitch, otherwise known as absolute pitch, the “ability to name or sing any note on demand”, written by someone who himself has perfect pitch. Ed Douglas reports on the findings of studies that have been published in six different science journals, and research scientists mentioned include Daniel Levitin, Sarah Wilson, Elizabeth Theusch, Analabha Basu, Jane Gitschier, Maria Teresa Moreno Sala, Eugenia Costa-Giomi, Patrick Bermudez, Psyche Loui, Diana Deutsch, Luca Tommasi and researchers at the RIKEN Brain Science Institute in Japan.
So if you are up for it here is a site you can start with…
It all seems very logical and based in biology more so than 'eat under 600 cals a day and dont mix protiens and eat no carbs etc' (Cohens).
And what now are of these sorrows
What does this have to do with marriage?
It isn’t a problem
Brinsley is there swapping cell-phone numbers with a leggy blonde, Chris Salaweicz (who edited the about-to-come-out Island book) is in the corner deep in conversation with former NME editor Neil Spencer; friends are calling other friends on cell-phones to tell them in which part of the building they are as a lady, some six feet away starts mouthing at me… I vaguely recognise her; no more. She barges her way toward me, spilling rum punch everywhere.
Today was another day of Kaplan. And boy did that review class come quick today. I stayed up watching movies with Justin last night and doing some online kaplan quizzes so i hopped in bed at 12:30. Well Jackson woke up at 2:30 and screamed andcried everytime Iput him down for three hours. I had to get up at seven so it was a brutal night. And this morning he screamed everytime I put him down again, so needless to say, I was late everywhere today. BUT, on the bright side of things, he was good for Oma and Lucas, and I got called for an interview for tomorrow at Johns Hopkins Bayview. I had to quickly arrange some last minute letters of reference and a transcript, but it all pulled through, so we'll see how tomorrow goes.
People who play this game have little to no regard for the feelings of their partners and they also have a very unhealthy way of seeking to maintain their desirability and relationships. The only way they can feel they can keep a partner interested in them is by showing that they can openly flirt with others as if that proves something.
Belloc remarks, in an essay entitled, "On New Years and New Moons," (The Silence of the Sea), that many different kinds of New Year's celebrations and datings can be found. Once the New Year began on "Lady's Day," March 25th. The Hebrews and the Chinese have differing dates for the New Year. Then there is the calculations that changed things a bit with establishment of the Julian and Gregorian Calendars.
Watching Heston's Feasts, I quickly became confused. I mean, it's not hard to understand - Blumenthal picks a period of history and usually a piece of literature or event around that time, examines the diet of the people/one particular person, and tries to emulate that "for the 21st century" as he relentlessly states. He then presents a 3/4 course meal for a group of celebrities to consume and discover the secrets of the quite well constructed and designed meals.
Although the singer has a love for heels, she understands that not everyone will purpose a pair of stilettos: “I like glamour, but I’m aware not everyone wants to wear a high heel all the time. I haven’t gone too far down the glamour line.”
So I decided I was in need of a major shake up. I liked the short bob some of you might remember from earlier this year, but this time I wanted more change. Since my last major cut, it had grown out and was just overgrown. Before and after cut above. (Didn't get before and after cut and color! oops!)
Thanks so much for stopping by today! Have a fantastic 4th of July! :)
For example, last week I had comments that my lectures are more like executive education than university, but also that the sessions are too theoretical and not practical enough. Multiply that contradiction by about 5-10 others and you start to get the picture.
3. A charged cell phone. Alas, I am not one to make sure my cell phone is at full charge all the time. Or even at any charge.
You take out your IPHONE and video your cappuccino cup complete with audio just in case he needs evidence for his lawsuit.
The City of Auburn Hills is proving each day that in this “New Economy” being fast and effective is the difference between winning and losing when attracting and retaining businesses.
Spread evenly the plum jam over the bottom of the crust, like this ... I'm not sure of the amount but you don't want a ton of jam, just enough to cover the bottom.
I think it is feeling better so I hope I am on the mend!!
Carteach chooses the pulsating laser for a variety of reasons. For one, it exactly matches the way the Lasermax unit works in my regular G-30 carry piece. For another, it nearly doubles battery life. Last.... it just works better for me to see the laser dot since it's pulsating. My theory on that is..... Man is a natural predator. Our eyes and brains are keyed to movement, and we see movement faster and easier than a still object.
In dog years I am sixteen and in human years I am seventy seven".
Well what another great week we have had, well here on the blog anyway. For some of us I know have been home with the sickies, all week, not so great! Some of us are having a great week down in Alabama! Everyone say, Hi Tracey!!! We here all wish her a safe return on her trip back from Talladega! Go Mark Martin! LOL!
last week when i visited Dodgers Stadium i spied a fantastic action photo of Jackie doing just that. the photo has it all: the ump in perfect position to make the call, freakin' gil hodges at bat !, the unlucky catcher slumped over as if in despair, an awesome cloud of dust and play at the plate dirt, and Jackie (is he smiling?), hat flying, safely past everyone still staring at the plate, as though his speed put him a full 2 seconds ahead of everybody else. it's a photo that our friend Play At The Plate might well appreciate.
Between working like mad at my new role, writing and then rewriting my book, trying to find where to live once September gets here, some pretty stressful family hiccups and my upcoming travel, I have existed squarely in the state of Head-Up-My-Ass. Oh, you didn’t know it existed? Trust me that you will find yourself there some unfortunate day and even more unfortunately, you will think of me. The problem with this state is that while you’re exceedingly busy trying to keep all of those balls in the air, you get nowhere. You’re feet never actually move forward. It’s infuriating.
The cute little elephants were cut from soy turkey slices using a Wilton cookie cutter. The blankets on their back were cut from pear peel and tiny bits of baby corn. Also they have nori eyes and more of the garlic tomato sauce for cheeks.
This is the best quality for this recording to date. I left it as I had received it, even the awkward separation in 'Musicatto'.
The combinations are infinite, so far over 1 million unique recipies have been created by its users, from a recipie that will call your mobile if the forecast changes to rain, or a facebook recipie that will send a message to someone if they post a photo of you on facebook of ‘that’ saturday night!
With that in mind, I offer you a quiz with seven questions about pigs and three about peanut butter (the answers are at the end of this post)*,**,***:
Ignorance is Bliss. Is it? It can be, I suppose . . . for a time.
As they pulled up to the little cowboy church he said, “You know, it’s not even my money. Everything I have comes from God. I’ll let him protect it. I know you think I’m being foolish because I keep all my money in such a precarious place, but look at where God entrusted his message.”
She bought a set of ionic foot bath plates from me.
I love you Tommy I love you Tommy I love you Tommy I love you Tommy I love you Tommy I love you Tommy
cut banana in half crosswise. coat banana in sugar and place in the wrapper. spread water all over the edges of the dough and roll it up like a burrito, sealing the ends by folding and pushing the dough together with your fingers. if a halved banana is too long, trim the edges to fit the dough. prepare all the banana pieces before frying. fry one or two at a time, carefully turning to brown evenly on all sides. remove from oil and slice rolls in half. serve warm over pineapple-coconut ice cream, with berries and a drizzle of caramel.
It’s not a super quick meal to prepare, but every single step is enjoyable and SUPER easy and straightforward. The reward far outweighs the prep time. I can’t think of anything I’d rather do on a warm, lazy weekend than cook (and eat and drink) outdoors.
My reward is feedback from readers. It doesn’t come often, in the form of written feedback, but I’ve been lucky enough to have a couple of letters from complete strangers who’ve read The Coward’s Tale - and the fact that they have been moved to write and tell me how much they’ve loved it, is
Did you know that Monday, September 26th was my Ukrainiversary (Thanks for the new word, Casey!), marking 365 glorious days in Ukraine! A pensive and introspective post about that in the future...but for now, an update.
it’s the least that least does in the abrupt butting of heads
Most industry insiders are suggesting that this will be the first all electric offering from Porsche and may hit showrooms as early as 2012 with 2013 being offered as a slightly more realistic shipping date.
Ressurrection is an author and speaker with a passion to share relationship strategies to promote healthy interpersonal relationships. She has a particular interest in helping single men and women prepare for and attract "the one." Please follow up with Ressurrection at: www.ressurrection.wordpress.com
The Poltergeist
sidebar:
I tend to plan a quilt project one year with smaller projects the next whilst maintaining the same beginners' course each year.
13. Enjoy with coffee, chocolate milk or take to work to woo your co-workers.
Valor or Valour: noun
This consisted of him donning his ancestor’s armor and riding around the countryside committing every single despicable act contained within the manuscript, of nights spent studying every page and expanding its vision, inventing new ways in which to honour the greatest Englishman who had ever lived. He saw in Roger a genius and understanding that bordered on the metaphysical and sublime that was incomplete, a philosophy and system of governance which sought to attain the highest form of perfection, but which faltered. David would be the one to complete it, to give birth to Roger’s resplendent miscarriage of ideology.
God bless this baby as she enters her 2nd year for she blesses so many others with her new and pure and sweet spirit.
6. Mark Strand, unexpectedly at Danny’s Tavern in Chicago
Work with Cameron Lynde? Are they kidding? Maybe, Jack thinks, this is some kind of welcome-back prank after his stint away from Chicago. But it's no joke; the pair is going to have to put their rocky past behind them and focus on the case at hand. That is, if they can cut back on the razor-sharp jibes- and smother the flame of their sizzling-hot
Click the link above for the entry form. Please type your name or screen name in the Caption or Title field, then choose the link and photo you'd like to enter. Please link directly to your specific blog post with your card in it, and not your general blog url.
Chains are broken in Your name
“And, Bertie,” Reginald paused to give Bertie a meaningful look, ”watch your paws. You know how easily your paws split open and you know how She feels about your paws splitting.”
My teacher taught me
I think Lou Reed is the most important American rock musician ever. Really! Trouble is, as good a guitarist as he is, he’s often a poor soloist. They meander here and there without making much of a statement, or, indeed, impression. Check out the solo in “Run Run Run”… great riff, crap solo. He would go on and get better – the soloing in “I Heard Her Call My Name” is just demented (though still quite directionless), but he’s essentially a rhythm guitar player. (It’s notable that his best work has been with great guitar players like Robert Quine and Mick Ronson, as well as Sterling Morrison, of course).
Peace at work and in the street,
Due to his growing he needed his ‘gastro’ site moved.
This is one fast way to NEVER get your query posted on the blog.
Dear God, I thank thee
Plaza Bapindo is where A is.
With an optimistic eye
10 Frank Murder - Bata
I really appreciate getting picked for top spots, much cause for the happy dance... I know, that's not an image you needed, but I do!!
Peterson finished taping his light to the top of his gun. He threw the roll of tape to the floor.
Wet on skin: Fruity with just a *bit* of craft store spice. I can smell the plum and spicy resin.
maker of heaven and earth
Top with 3 cups miniature marshmallows and bake for 3 minutes more.
They were really good but in my opinion I rather have the extra coconut and peanut butter layer in between with the extra dark chocolate chips on top, just saying :-)
Know-how grant
office actions have been taken)
There were lots of slugs, like this guy:
the window, and
The other day, I took down my well worn copy of A Little Princess. Just running my hand over the cover made my heart smile. That small little book holds so many precious memories. I remember sitting in Mama's lap as she read it to me, eagerly waiting for her to turn the pages and find out what would happen next. As I got older, I remember carrying it a little basket down to the big oak tree by the barn. I would sit there, beneath the constant downpour of acorns, and read for hours. Suddenly, I became Sara Crewe, forced to live in the cold attic, mistreated and hungry. Hot indignation would rise in my chest as Miss Minchin (whose first name just happened to be Amanda...) unjustly punished and humiliated Sara before the other girls. But then, it was always replaced by a peaceful triumph as Sara repaid evil with good. Just looking at the cover of this beloved book causes all of these memories and feelings to come rushing back. Somehow, looking at a chunk of black or white plastic just doesn't have the same effect...
free flu shot, otherwise individuals will be required to pay up to $30 by
- Bloomington Symphony Orchestra: $855.87 for its 2012 Summer Concert in the Park project.
Next, we see the kid-who-has-no-name-as-of-yet, whose name turns out to be Sam. Sam makes a grand entrance by saying “You invited the doof!” She doesn’t seem to be too fond of Freddie, yet. His comeback was epic, calling Sam that. And now, here comes a little AV club classic comedy. Then Sam pulls out her secret weapon: “Carly will never love you.” After an attempt to leave, Freddie is convinced to stay by a “Please stay” from Carly. She has him by the figurative leash.
I weigh myself daily ONE time, first thing in the morning, naked, no jewelry, after my morning pee. That’s my ritual. Some people weigh daily, some weekly, some monthly and some…many, many times a day.
Simply consider the value that broadband access can bring to any household. In today’s technology-driven world, online access can provide freedom like no other resource. You can do pretty much anything online from shopping, banking, attending classes, placing prescriptions, to even researching and running a business. Although the former all provide convenience to the end-user, the latter can “level the playing field” to a budding entrepreneur looking to compete in an ever-tightening economic environment.
Seriously! This has been such a huge transition the past couple of weeks. With back to school and back to work and back to schedule I’ve been adjusting and it’s been hard! I’ve been fighting a cold/soar throat for the past couple of weeks, getting up earlier in the morning then I have in a very long time and turning a year older. If I could make it to 9:00 at night I felt that I was accomplishing something monumental! What can I say.
10. You may seek professional help in case of very severe back acne. Theirs is nothing to be ashamed about. Dermatologists are willing to help people suffering this kind of skin problem. They would probably recommend medicines that needs prescription, antibiotics that should be taken orally, topical treatments, retinol or even oral contraceptives (for female only).
The "thing-in-itself" nonsensical. If I remove all the relationships, all the "properties," all the "activities" of a thing, the thing does not remain over; because thingness has only been invented by us owing to the requirements of logic, thus with the aim of defining, communication (to bind together the multiplicity of
Cricut Straight from the Nest cart.
-I felt like I failed, because I was going after that horse.
I’ll start the series on Tuesday and run it every Tuesday and Thursday in January. Stay tuned for lots of tips from your favourite bloggers!
"What happened when you woke up?"
Our sincere thanks to each of you who played in the No DP challenge! With so many amazing creations, who needs DP? Okay, we all do... but you've proved that it isn't required to a make a beautiful card!
I wanted to post one more project before leaving for CHA (Craft & Hobby Assoc.) Conference and Trade Show in Anaheim, CA. Using Spellbinders™ Paper Arts most recent release, S5-078 Persian Accents, S5-079 Persian Motifs, Spellbinders Edgeabilities® E8-007 Classic Edges One dies and Spellbinders M-Bossabilities™ EL-002 Regal (Side B) Folder, I created a note pad with pockets.
Mama told Daddy (the man with the deep loud voice) that I was smart. If I was so smart, I wouldn't get yelled at for eating something Mama calls "poop-sicles" and I would've known what a purse was. Duh.
“The Olympus school in Patras had been dismantled and the usable parts were shipped to the U.S to become the foundation for a new school, Olympus Prestige, a private school for the moderately wealthy in the Schuylkill area of Pennsylvania. A new town had even sprung up around the school, Elysia.
05 Fit and Working Again
What could I say about the pending, probable loss? How could I possibly find the right words to express how I felt about the sad passing of someone I didn’t even know existed? Maybe this would’ve been appropriate:
thoughts perceiving worms as a useless animal. Finally, there is a section where kids can explore different kind of worms.
I am curious beyond despair to push this button and find out what happens…except, of course, that my fear of the unknown trumps my curiosity and so the button remains untouched.
Kentucky joins a long list of states that have imposed cuts on court services in recent years in a bid to balance budgets hurt by the economic downturn, according to the National Conference of State Legislatures.
To make it worse, the power to collect this information was gained via a last-minute, smoke-and-mirrors amendment at committee stage of the School Standards and Framework Act 1998. It took just ten minutes.
I should’ve taken a photo of their business card. It’s really cool. It’s rounded and gold with purple letters. I will take a picture of it someday. (I’ve seen the most creative business cards in Jakarta.)
Wondered why the angels sing
I was without a computer for a few days. Mine took a dump on Monday morning with the death blue screen. Got it into the shop Monday night and got it back late this morning. Thank goodness it wasn't anything serious like a virus or anything else. Just had to replace the WiFi thingy on it.
(Jack) Thanks, Ural for taking the time to share your insights today. You are truly gifted.
Then on or around May 4th you will receive another email from me with the html code for publishing the giveaway. Note it is required that you publish the giveaway html in full to be included in this event. I will verify links on May 7th around 10am central and if you have not done so, your link on the rafflecopter will be removed. This keeps this event fair for all who joins.
I will give you the exact recipe as given in the magazine. JP adjusted it to use less cooked beef and more carrots and mildly adjusted the flavorings to his taste. A delicious recipe but one I would actually change the next time we make it by doubling the tomato sauce and blending half the sauce in with the meat mixture to lighten it and add more moisture. As I said above, this is a fabulous filling turned into a ragout to serve over pasta.
"Looks laa-ve-ly, Doug"
As adults, we are always, always trying to get that childhood magic back again. We go to lengths and really aren’t aware of it. The magic starts for people when they are reminded of their childhood. Which is why finding a way to bring that back to an audience is the most important. If we all do that, we succeeded.
religion, mysticism – but also more recently from
Finally, we have a good friend who works for a large local church. They were having a ski trip up at Mt. Baker for the middle school kids and needed chaperons. Our friend Lindsay invited Ty and myself to chaperon. It was great! Ty drove the bus and had a great day on the hill. I spent most of my day teaching a couple of girls how to ski. And I really liked it. One of them was really cautious and did pretty much exactly what I told her. The other one had a little trouble listening and took off down the hill. Straight down, no snow plowing, nothing. She eventually fell down, losing all of her equipment. To be honest, I thought she had to have broken something. But she was fine. A little shaken up, and she finally listened to me on how to ski. I also got a good run in with Ty and Lindsay. We all went to dinner at a pizza place, where I got a full cup of ice water dumped in my lap, and we ended the day with a movie. This morning, I woke up incredibly sore. Yep, it was a great day at the hill. :)
Share them with your kids and share them with us!
Enticing lyrics over a hypnotic beat
The mysterious “bit 2″ of the first two registers are actually compatibility modes for the SEGA Master System. Bit 2 of register 1 OFF sets 8 colours per palette, and bit 2 of register 2 OFF puts the VDP in SMS display mode. The first register needed fixing up to turn on horizontal sync interrupts.
I'll be posting more about the conference as I get it all sorted out in my head, but for now much of it is all jumbled together.
Yet he used a different flavour and the result was that he caught 5 times more common carp compared to mirror carp. Now I know from long experience on very many waters that many common carp strains grow comparatively more slowly compared to mirror carp in the same water. The question is whether you wish to use flavours to select more mirror carp, or more common carp. But how is it you can exploit flavours in this way?
So, what do we have this week? Well, our very talented teamie Nat has come up with a cracker of a sketch....
The major difference is, of course, that a new religion was not built around the personality of Genghis Khan. Perhaps we should be grateful for that. Otherwise, the largest voting block at the United Nations might now have been the Organisation of Mongolian Cooperation, and the BBC and the New York Times would warn us against the dangers of Genghisophobia.
I am so glad I got this done. I hope some of you can use this. Just a reminder that I have a chance for you to get free April Math Centers on my previous post. Make sure to check back on Thursday because there might be a little surprise for everyone!
For never do prayers go unanswered,
. . . The district court and this court did consider the precise question at issue on reexamination: whether Deutsch satisfies the "flowing" limitation of the asserted claims and, thus, anticipates them. And both courts upheld the validity of the ’484 patent in light of Deutsch. Nevertheless, the statutory language, legislative history, and different purposes underlying reexamination and federal court proceedings suggest that the determination of a substantial new question is unaffected by these court decisions.
My old lenses that were 7/16" at the thickest point are now a slim, svelte 4/16" (Yes, I know that is not a proper fraction but I am using it to illustrate my point...sigh...)
When we moved from our Maryland dairy to the northwest wilderness of Maine on the United States-Canadian border, during the spring of 1961, there was 10 feet of snow in our lakeside driveway. Looking westward from the windows of the rustic hand-hewed log cabin, we enjoyed a panoramic vista of the wilderness across the lake where the mountainous horizon beyond merged into the Province of Quebec.
- 1932: Japan attacks Shanghai, China in 1932
In any event, this past Shabbat, a few of us took a walk down to the monkey temple, just to get out of the house. I remarked at the time that when I first arrived at Swayambhou there had once been trees and trees and trees full of monkeys but now I could hardly spot a single one.
10. After the first two weeks of sleeping in a tent, having to drive forty minutes for a shower, not having any running water, and working til you’re exhausted, hygiene and appearance take a header. Big time. Hair’s a mess? Tie on a handkerchief. Pine sap on every exposed bit of skin? Ignore it. Gotta run into town to pick up something at the hardware store and you’re covered in dirt and pine sap and you probably don’t smell the freshest? Who cares!
I don’t know who said this, but it is a great piece of wisdom that we should all embrace.
There is a representative in their Alabama county who is working to raise the age of consent to eighteen. Here is her website. Click Here! If you live in Alabama, especially the county that Jason Kidd lives in, you should give Becky Nordgren a phone call to support her bill.
13. Cumbia De Los Muertos - Ozomatli (U.S.A.) / 3:32
Deputy Richard Boyd Barrett: ￼ ￼ No.
Ladies and Gentlemen, enjoy the ride to Williamsburg today. We'll be pulling up to the corner Steakhouse at Leonard Street and Conselyea Street. I went there for some pictures. I walked away with a memory.
Place on greased tins, leaving space - they spread!
This is a very narrow and flawed view of relationships and the search for someone to spend the rest of your life with.
Previous years’ analyses have consistently shown that Bountiful residents are charged significantly higher electric rates and “customer charges” compared to the private (and heavily regulated) Rocky Mountain Power. I don’t have time to crunch numbers this year (rates or taxes)…maybe I’ll try next week…or the week after.
Chuck Berry and Johnny be Good
See do and do
Executive Summary:
I usually write pretty tightly when it comes to screenplays, but that’s what happens when I don’t have enough preparation time to follow my own advice I suppose.
The plot, which involves the killing of three policemen, and an attack on a fourth (plus an attack on Diamond) is extremely elaborate. As a result, the book is longer than some of Lovesey’s earlier books, but the quality of writing remains high. The story may be unorthodox, but it is certainly entertaining, and proof – were it needed – that one of Britain’s most distinguished mystery novelists is still as good at keeping
These are photos I took myself, so they are not professional installation shots; but they should give at least some sense of how the exhibition is taking shape and what you can expect to see in the galleries. See forthcoming posts for more.
No. Not if you're using that word in its usual (dumbass, meaningless) sense.
For Trainers/Coaches/Teachers/Professors:
-11 57 ’6.67 , -76 52 25.71
Once worked out it's about repetition.... In addition we're bringing in support, we even arranged fro opportunities for you to Sell these items at Arts Culture Fest and have put teh evnt on The Internet Week NY Calendar
In response to a report that was the outcome of the Human Rights Watch research, and the efforts of other civil society organizations, several South African government officials committed to addressing abuses and enforcing labor laws, in spite of negative reactions from farm owners.
That being stated let us look at what the New Testament does say about judgment and God.
Simply in love.
Row 11- Repeat row 9
With all that said, I've decided to do something I haven't done in the 3 years I've been writing this blog and that's opening up the floor for any questions that you lovely folks might have for me. I'm a pretty open book and there isn't much I won't answer except maybe what my social security number is so ask away and I'll post the answers sometime next week.
#cdnpoli ‏@cdnpoIi:
"I HEARD YOU."
The London terminal control general manager for National Air Traffic Services (Nats), Paul Haskins, will be responsible for organising thousands of aircraft jetting in and out of the capital for the summer showpiece – and avoiding a catastrophic mid-air collision.
This dirtbag unintentionally described the whole “occupy” scenario:
This is just a sampling of what I've been through and am going through with this man. This is the sort of person who wants the voters in Ward 8 to trust him? If he will treat his wife, his children, and his friends in this manner, then there really is no one that he won't betray in his desire for political power. I hope that the voters in Ward 8 learn this before it is too late.
Here's where else we tasted at in Walla Walla:
Rather, I have been reflecting on a great deal of what I have been reading lately on the subject of 9/11, and it has only convinced me of what I already suspected: that there is a certain frightening lack of depth, of soul, of generosity, of historical understanding, of imagination, of sophistication, of compassion, of humanity.
The meeting will take place tomorrow (Tuesday) at the Belarusan Church, 401 Atlantic Ave. More details here.
I am a sieve when it comes to current events. I tune out of many such conversations, particularly political ones.
Who knew I was such a connoisseur of champagnes and that I would have such strong opinions on it?
3) Women always fall in the love of their friends because they’re always find what they’re yearning for in a lover in that friend; never misspell their names, smile on their silly jokes, and tell them stories of his childhood.
The Serpa holster is just like that... a mechanical device that can fail in any number of ways, just like the pistol it's made to carry. There is a chance either unit can fail in normal or weird ways, and it's almost assured each will at some point. Just as with ball bearings, we accept the risk in exchange for the benefit of using them.
This time, my PSP is to estimate the amount of energy I personally use. It includes residents and transportation energy use daily and annually. This report has a rough estimation of the economic cost and environmental cost “CO2 emission” of my energy usage.
Soon, curiosity got the better of me and I went stealthily toward their backdoor and sneaked in. The house was full of neighbors/people and there was such a flurry of action and noise that I was never observed.
Here are videos of them doing their thing: Horne in Stormy Weather and the trailer for Hayward's I Want To Live. Below that is a newsreel about Hayward visiting her alma mater, Girls Commercial High School in Prospect Heights.
John 1:36
Again, not really into crucifix even though I do love saint charms and images of the Virgin, but I have to say these milk glass candle holders are fab. I mean, SO retro and just amazing.
I drank a Glass of water and settled for a shower. Had some plain Oats and sliced a Banana with it for Breakfast.
When it became completely personal...........
White Castle sliders* and cheeseburgers*
I want to start seeing some Hearts since Valentine's Day is fast approaching.
1T grated ginger
A parker with leather jacket for the top and black jeans for the bottom.
Still not really in the mood for this card making lark but my craft room is slowly getting tidier. I hope I kick in again soon as I need to get on with all the Christmas stuff I've started. I haven't had much time this week though as I went with Speedy to Liverpool hospital for his tests on Monday and Tuesday. Two nuclear heart scans, one after exercising on Monday and one resting on Tuesday. Both appointments took 4 hours !! 15 minutes to do the actual test and the rest was spent hanging around waiting for the Chemical injections to take effect. On both days it didn't work first time so had to be redone. Still, that's over with now.
She is my daughter. But she is herself. I do not possess her. She is a consciousness, independent and complete unto herself.
The freeway access is incredible… just a one minute commute to the Mt. Lehman interchange and you’re on your way!
I don’t know why I do this, but I can’t seem to stop myself.
With the indwelling Holy Spirit, we as believers enjoy today, we have an unspeakable advantage over David and every other believer under Law. Yet how often we flounder when faced with opposition. We do so because we do not recognize the work of God’s grace. We try to overcome evil encounters in our own strength, which will certainly end in disaster.
Article 19: Copyright-related manuscripts, master copies, lawful publications, work registry certificates, copyright contract registry certificates, proof provided by authentication organs, contracts of acquisition of rights, as well as infringing reproductions obtained by way of ordering, buying on the spot etc., by the parties or their entrusted persons and acquired objects, invoices etc, may act as evidence.
Everybody is talking about the Laker’s Andrew Bynum and his game Sunday. It was a stellar effort, one which Los Angeles needed on a couple of levels.
Random things occupying/bugging me on this cold cold cold Monday:
Taslin said, "Relax. Your tension may draw the Axtli's awareness."
We then took the bus further across the island to Penguin Land! Chiloe island is home to Magellan and some other penguins (which look pretty similar but one has 1 stripe and the other has 2) we took a small boat out into the sea to see the penguins…they were so cute. They live here from December to March to breed. We also saw cormorants and a red beaked oyster catcher (I’m sure that’s probably not it’s real name) Whilst on the boat, it began to rain a little harder….by the time we were finished, we were soaked through. The next group of penguin watchers were given ponchos….we were jealous. We attempted to dry off and warm up in a cafe, but the owner had no hot chocolate and then ran out of mil for the people who wanted coffee. More bus time to the main city of Ancud (this bus was really crappy and had already started to leak water out of the ceiling light making one of the back seats unsuitable for human occupation) along mor winding roads – I don’t remember this part – having already become travel sick on the initial bus/ferry/bus/bus/penguins boat part of the trip, my eyes closed and I believe I slept (preferable to throwing up on your fellow travellers) we arrived at the fort, built to protect Chiloe island from someone who wanted to invade or possibly to keep the spanish out during a civil war, I don’t remember, I’d just woken up. This was followed by a quick trip to a church exhibition (Chiloe has about 16 churches that are protected by UNESCO, just a small selection of it’s huge collection of churches) and local market which sold fish (naturally) veg and dried seaweed along with the naffest collection of handicrafts I’ve ever seen. It still hadn’t stopped raining, so we decided to call it a day, get back on the bus and head back to the ferry.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to judge myself for not being able to make the jump within realization that the jump is not really necessary but what is necessary is the construction and design of the bridge across which I could walk in absolute certainty – the bridge is the process of self-forgiveness, self-honesty and self-corrective application
This leads me to something I'm gonna start on my blog it will be called "the dumb things I have to say to the kids"
Needing...to finish packing up and cleaning out my house. We are not set to move, but boy have we been living with some clutter. My husband really took the ball with this last showing. He out-did himself and I am grateful!
This morning, I am heading out with Brad for coffee and an appointment followed by the gym. After my big lunch date, I need to spend some time on the house, read and take care of some bills.
So if we take this much time and effort to prepare FOR THE DEAD…how can we not take this much time and effort and even some more FOR THE LIVING? While we still have breath in our body how dare we not take productive chances and risks that can make us happy and live a better, joyful, longer, free in Jesus life? The world is already in disarray….so dont add to it with promoting the unbalancing act of your life to it…
Karleton D.B. Fyfe, 31, Brookline, Massachusetts
Now there are already laws in existence that proscribe the preaching of race hatred, and it is true that the BBC in collaboration with the Crown Prosecution Service sought to convict the BNP Chairman of transgressing the already established legal parameters. Twice in 2006, Nick was hauled into the dock, only for a jury of his peers to clear him of any wrongdoing. Clearly they didn't think the BNP was spreading 'vindictive and malicious poison', then.
A few years ago, I wrote a middle grade novel called It's Raining Cupcakes.
It's too soon to tell if things are working, but today was a good day. It was the first day in a long time that she didn't spend the ENTIRE day trying to go. It was the first day in a long time that I enjoyed spending time with her playing, instead of trying to comfort her or brush away tears (hers and mine) as she suffered on the floor.
Keera’s reply: At one time I would have answered this question entirely different. I would have said it was a dark and dreary day. Selfish? Perhaps, but it’s the truth. Now, it’s the one thing that once brightened my day that is my biggest vulnerability, that and the threat of my loved ones being hurt. A few select others know of my secret. They have secrets of their own and would never tell another soul.
I've had a couple of emails from readers asking if they could make this soap and sell it. I am sharing this recipe with whomever wants to use it, but please don't think this is just a quick and easy way to make money. You need to understand what you're doing and be absolutely sure that every soap you produce is something you are proud of. I think the key to my soap making success was that quality was my priority and people trusted me; soap was only part of the equation.
huey lewis & the news - "heart and soul"
Bask bask in the monolithic glory of Adam as the original man with the power-tool and be moved by the way Epstein captures nature and monumental force out of a hulk of alabaster. It's an encounter with our own essence, not a moment for "shame" or an act of withdrawal. I asked my friend, a nearly fifty year old artist if he felt "embarrassed" by the sculpture and he confirmed he didn't. Its power draws you in, there's something vastly majestic, earthly embracing and sexual about it, something you want to move towards, anti-repulsive. Unlike Damien Hirst's fly-traps of rotten barbecue and whatever else.
I'LL LET KRUPA'S IMAGES PROVE WHY SHE IS AND MUST REMAIN GUARANTEED NOT HALAL:
An inhabitant of Mowsley who appeared to have lunched well saw me looking at the map and urged me to take the gated road to Laughton.
I mean, really, Henry. Where can it go from here?
Jenro smiled. He liked deep conversations.
Are we in danger of that again? Is dumb money coming in, are expectations rising, will bad beer flood the shelves? I'll be honest: I did think so, a few years ago. I was worried. But now? No, I don't think so. First, and most convincing, solid bank money is available to established breweries, even in the current economy. Three years of unstoppable growth in the face of a general downturn in beer sales is quite a convincer. It may not be cheap money, but it's there. Second, brewers like Victory have done their part to nail down the quality of American craft brewers. I'm talking about safe in the bottle quality, no infected beer (not unintentionally infected, anyway!), solid shelf-life quality. It used to be a crapshoot; now getting a sub-par beer is much, much less likely.
I need to brew it's been a few year's since I've seen so many of my boy's empty.
This is so easy to make and I think it's so adorable that I want to make one for everything. Have a few more looks:
If you have not purchase the 3 month kit tutorial (Sept, Oct and Nov) now is the time and you will still get the August kit tutorial for FREE.
even aware of these credible side of the story?
Hello and Welcome to the first post of the month from Willow Sketchie Challenge, this time it's me, Kelly hosting this week's challenge.
“As the deer pants for the water so my soul longs after you, you alone are my hearts desire and I long to worship you. You alone are my strength, my shield, to you alone may my spirit yield. You alone are my hearts desire and I long to worship you.”
“Bill Shorten should go back and be the Minister for Industrial Relations and not the minister for the HSU.”
Think now about your siblings. Did you have any? Were you an only child? Did any of your attitudes towards them or their attitudes towards you cause you anxiety or shame? How did your parents treat all of you, did they play you against one another? Was there unhealthy competition between you because of your parents playing favorites? Just remember, like we learned in the previous exercise, none of this is about you. You had almost nothing to do with your parents system of managing you and your siblings as children.
I started with the Mini Jar Stamp Set, which is absolutely adorable. This is my new favorite stamp, love the old fashion feel to it. It speaks to my vintage heart. I love the size of it ....it has so much versatility.
Yes, I am claiming that without God there is no good. Now, does it matter if you believe it or not? Not at all. Gravity still exists even if I don't believe in it. So, even if you have a professing atheist, they will still have morality because we have consciences that was given to us by God. Your religion may call it alaya-vijnana although I don't fully understand the term.
I love this word! Some days we need to be bodacious! And some days, we need to remember to apply it to our own self-care.
Campaign furniture, for me, evokes a by-gone era when the British Empire was in its ascendency… when Britannia Ruled the Waves and the Raj was in full swing. The romantic image (as opposed to the harsh reality) is what appeals to me.
Runner Up : Brodies - Black IPA(keg) - no matter what Queally says, I like this version.
Instead, I have pictures of the sky
Jesus had spoken to the disciples as the embarked on that journey across Galilee, “Let us cross over to the other side.” He fully intended to arrive at the other side. And I believe they would have made it even if he did not calm the storm. Perhaps the storm would have dissipated as quickly as it blew in had they only waited a few more minutes. But in their fear, they had forgotten his words. “Carest thou not that we perish?” they cried.
Douglas Murray
Home Exterior Decorating Ideas
Radio One DJ Chris Moyles is also a Snob, only following back 82 of his 2.3 million fans. Other Snobs include Guardian Books, Jemima Khan (following back only 150 of 170,000 followers), Eminem (no interactions), the New Statesman (selling as few as 4,000 copies a week according to Guido Fawkes), Mariah Carey (following back just 58 of 7 million fans), Queen Rania, Telegraph writer Mary Riddell, Yvette Cooper (and she wants to be the next Labour leader), Donald Trump and TMZ.com.
*Once or twice a month you will participate in Triple Tiara Tuesday. (T3) T3 is a new weekly mini blog hop/challenge that we are starting in January. This takes the place of our weekly blog hops.
Hope everyone enjoyed this!
It's strange how insignificant my birthday is this year. Past years, I tried to blot out the pain of infertility and loss by packing it full of plans. I made sure to fill it with people and places that would make me smile, because I knew that by the end of the night I'd probably cry. This year, I've known it was coming up but there are no plans. I'm content with letting my birthday pass unacknowledged.
Passion, I guess. And honesty. I run an organization that supports our troops, and we do feel-good stuff. Sending toys and care packages, getting involved with the community, and touching lives. For good or bad, I wanted to bring it on home: it's not all rainbows, beanie babies, and homemade cookies.
What about you guys...anyone else get hit with this massive storm? If so, how long were you stuck?
The day sometimes flies by and next we know it
The second one is an even tougher nut to crack. There was a crack. I guess that’s what made yesterday tough. I was expecting signs of a crack and nothing came. Patience is a virtue(al reality).
but in ways you never expected.
In reference to partners across the globe, NATO maintains that “Japan is NATO’s longest-standing global partner,” adding:
Then I realized that I can be right and be kind. By keeping my damn mouth shut.
Fanfarlo + Philco Fiction. Well then, Fanfarlo return to these shores to treat one and all to their musical treats. These guys are ace and should deffo be seen live! Ably backing them up on the night is Philco Fiction. No excuses, you have been warned! Go!
The segment where the Pinto flies off the unfinished freeway overpass was actually filmed in Milwaukee, Wisconsin.
madness.
2 – Sebastian VETTEL (Red Bull)
Intellectual Property:
*Additional reference material used: Old Testament Student Manual: Religion 301, pg 103-108
Doomsday Book, Connie Willis
Silence. We looked at each other, eyes wide. Mr. Z continued, unaware he was crushing our greedy dreams with his ruthless honesty. “The pond bank is lined with tarp and sandbagged, to prevent it from washing away. You’ve been pulling the sandbags out of the ground. That’s all they are.”
Every time I think of those plastic covered vines, I think of my spiritual growth. Some years, months or days, I am ripening at the proper time. Other times, I am in slow growth mode; lagging in growth and feeling a bit bitter. But, at the appointed time when its time for my next growth spurt, Jesus gently covers me with grace, fortitude and keeps me producing in the safety of His vineyard. Without Jesus, I can’t produce. Through Jesus, I can the abundant harvest meant for my life-song. If I make Jesus my comfort and my home, His words will be with-in me. Then I can finally be the mature vine I want to be and finally producing the gifts He has given. Oh Lord, help me to continue yielding the harvests in my life for without You, I can do nothing!
Marc and I decided to go have a mini-date grocery shopping.
Two weeks after moving into our new home, I was
S4-239 Butterfly Circles
This is exactly what their rivals in the ruling Barisan Nasional want.
NYC “White Shirt” Cop Supervisors Help Arrest Wall Street Protesters
I know it's just one day, but feeling better today gives me hope and feeds my faith.
105) I'm doing my own little "Project 365" this year, and I want to see that through to the end. I guess I should say "Project 366", right? Anyhow. I want to take a shot a day, with my real camera. I'm not above popping an iPhone photo in there now and again, but I want to limit that sort of thing to the extent possible.
all edges have been distressed with distress tool and Tea Dye Distress Ink
It has occurred to me that no one in the world has more access to info.insight into human nature, more interesting stories about what we as a species really are. Things that are more interesting than outer space, inner-space. Why we do what we do, because we are a mix of hereditary/environment. What trumps, more often, how do you empower people? How do you help children whose identity has been fucked-over?
Regular readers here, and followers on Twitter, will already be aware of my efforts to maximise my skein of Ivy Brambles Romantica Merino Lace with StashDown2012 in mind while making Laminaria. As mentioned before, the designer gives a chart for what percentage of yarn you’ll need to do another repeat of the Blossom Chart and the edging. My problem with this is that it didn’t relate the figures back to what 100% was. It meant a significant difference in yardage needed depending on whether 100% was:
I know that the weight I lose from my slow lifestyle changes will change how I look. I have no problem being a big girl. It's who I've always been, and it's a role I'm quite comfortable with. My only goal as far as appearances go are to have curves that are defined (like April's) instead of just looking like I do (all boobs, butt and belly). Oh, and I want to have awesome upper arms so that I can tattoo them.
Here is more evidence of how worthless the United Nations is. Instead of investigating truly devastating conditions of hunger around the world, they're investigating the problem of hunger in...Canada. Yeah, that's the real source of the world's hunger crises.
In the arms of an Angel far away from here
8. Rotherham Emphasized Bible: Very Literal 19th Century translation quite useful for comparisons.
VILLAGRASSA JR, MORATILLA L, SANZ C, MORAN M, FERNANDEZ MJ, PASTOR V. ¿Por qué no de vacuna contra la gripe el personal de un hospital? Medicina Preventiva. 2003; 9: 7-13.
“Because there’s no one to call.” Katie looked up and stared at Ted. The look in her eyes gave Ted a creepy feeling.
Sufi, rock, jazz or just hindi masala songs… mood decides…
Okay, seriously, there are no good puns with “beta”:
So there you go - a heartwarming tale of how the internet works for the good, connecting people and unearthing lost treasures. I really have no idea how the TD/ST combo works for anyone who doesn't recall it from back in the day, but to me it still sounds magical. It's good to be back.
Although I was happy with this look, I think there was one thing that really made it shine… the beautiful Mareband that I put on Jade! Big Mare had made it for me this weekend and the bright colours in the band seemed to compliment this look perfectly. She makes all sorts of amazing bands and can make custom orders, too. See more from her collection by clicking here.
Place: The proprietor of the Braidburn Inn donated the use of his function suite and a few plates of sandwiches, very welcome since the hustings began at six. (I was last there for a Christmas Day lunch with family in the 1990s, but it’s the local pub/guest house for our chair and for Gordon Murdie. We could probably have fitted five dozen people into the room and it was small enough that microphones were not needed.)
Most women, statistically, will outlive their husbands or male partners. We have to be ready, in every way, to survive — and thrive — on our own.
Fast forward to this past week. Apparently, he still has my number. I got an out of the blue text from him and of course, I had no idea who it was. So, I asked - and naturally, he didn't take that kindly. He started send me insults masked with little emotion cons, then got upset if I ignored him. I told him flat out that I was not interested and to please take his time elsewhere.
March 12th, Monday: 10:00am - 4:00pm, class fee is $75.00 (journal included)
Little Noah: (Jessie's son)
Over the next few days coincidences came thick and fast. He popped up to say hello as I shared my morning coffee with the puppy; he was passing by as I set off to dive; he was in bar in the evening as I relaxed with a hard earned beer. What happenstance!
Speaking of people visiting, both of my sister's visited recently. I really really really like being close to the border. It's wonderful to have people come and visit. :) I hope this trend continues!
So Feynman “stopped trying to keep up with what others were doing and went back to his roots, comparing experiment with theory, making guesses that were all his own.” Thus he became creative again, as he had been when he had just been working things out for himself, before becoming a famous physicist in academia. While this is an important lesson for science, it is a supreme lesson for any discipline where “current knowledge” can be dominated by theories that are simply incoherent.
Comments on His body
(These are collected in The Atrocity Archives)
for a delectable meal that lasted over three hours
The way she’d act and the color of her hair
She wondered how he’d handle her. Most men she met either fawned like a groupie or treated her like shit. Since he was bought and paid for, she figured she’d test him before she made her final decision. If she didn’t like him, she’d demand her money back before they even hit the elevators. “Funny, me too. But I like a good game of blackjack to relax.”
After such a remarkable run of success for their Catalan adversaries, Real Madrid acted decisively. They already boasted the world’s top goalkeeper, Iker Casillas. Before the 2009 season they spent nearly 300 million Euros on transfers, bringing in two of the world’s top 10 players, Brazilian Kaka and Portuguese winger Christiano Ronaldo. (Ronaldo is widely-considered the world’s second best player after Barcelona’s Messi.) They also bought Liverpool’s midfield playmaker Xabi Alonso. With those players on board, they had anticipated beating Barcelona in 2009. But they didn’t. So in 2010 they made perhaps their biggest move yet in hiring the world’s most successful manager, Jose Mourinho of Portugal. Name a trophy you can win and Mourinho has won it. His teams play a ruthlessly efficient defensive, counter-attacking style that makes it almost impossible for the other team to score. Moreover, he boasted an impeccable home record, having not lost a home match in domestic league play in nearly 10 years. And most important to the Madrid faithful, he was known as a Barca killer. He had coached briefly at the club as an assistant in the early 2000s before his meteoric rise as a head coach. And in the 2009 Champions League his Inter Milan side became the one club in Guardiola’s two seasons that managed to crack Barca, beating them in the semifinal round of the Champions League. With Mourinho on board, in addition to the presence of Ronaldo, Casillas, Alonso, Kaka, and the rest of the Madrid squad, it was thought they may finally have too much for Barca to handle.
When dawn breaks they ask me how I am; I say, "I'm fine...you?" Why do I say that? Why don't I say, "look into my eyes, how do you think I look? I feel like shit but I'll tell you I'm fine because it's easier." That way I don't need to talk about my fear. Sometimes, when The Farmer holds me, I feel frightened to let him go just in case I never get the chance to hold him again. I want to stop missing my dad every fucking day and I want to stop crying when I look into his eyes. My Farmer may one day not be here either and that scares the hell outta me. But I'm fine. Just like everything else, I'll get over it and move on. One day I'll look down on my life and see only the good bits - the bad bits will be yesterday's fish and chip paper. I'll hold onto those memories, the good ones, and I'll say, "look at me, I'm fine." And I will be.
i think there’s a difference between setting a minimum standard and ruling out every possible act that might disrupt our current income flows. be wary of your local farmer’s organization. chances are, it is run by the same mob mentality that runs the banks and law firms and construction companies. not mob mentality like free-flowing, organic decision-making of the reactionary variety, but mob like we will literally remove your person from this plane of existence if you refuse to play by the only game in town (concrete shoes, whacked by a made-man type “mob”). there is no logic left once the foundations have been exposed. refusal to address the only item on the agenda is a sign of a complete disconnection from reality. where on god’s green earth are you people? it’s like you’re stuck in a crappy looping “patriotic” video that manages to insult your intelligence and every category of being except the people who have cash.
of daylight
His remains were moved from Santa Marta to Caracas in 1842, where a monument was set up for his burial. The Quinta’ near Santa Marta has been preserved as a museum with numerous references to his life.
then there was this morning.
T: 1/60
1120 N. Ashland (just get off Division & head dirty south)
I love this time of year. Summer is waning & fall is slowing rolling in bringing with it the need purchase new notebooks & pens, the smell of fall leaves & a new group of UW students who are embarking on amazing international experiences. I would like to introduce you all to our Fall 2011 & Academic Year 2011-2012 UW Study Abroad Bloggers!
The public and judiciary need to wake up to the fact that the ONLY part of the justice system that is currently preventing more of the riots that occurred in August is the police. Deterrent sentences and effective rehabilitation are almost completely absent in out justice system.
Press coconut flakes into an ungreased pie plate, pushing them up the sides. Then drizzle a thin layer of honey on top of the coconut flakes.
ANYWAYS, sorry to keep you all waiting. I still haven't gotten new batteries for my camera, but in the meantime I did take some photos with my camera on my iphone. They are not the best quality, ok...they are stinky quality, but hey...you take what you can get. So here are some cards I made for co-workers. I still have a handful requested to make that I"m still working on, so I'll post those laters. I also have some scrapbook pages I did at the Crop-For-A-Cure that I haven't photographed yet and need to post. So much fun stuff left to do! Maybe I'll have some time this weekend (*crossing fingers*).
Isn’t that preferable? I love this these invitations, the bold, graphic illustration, free of text cluttering up the image, and the lavender barbie logo on the pink grid background. I bought a couple of these, and I believe there are still more available, but if you want them, you’ll have to hurry before I go back and snatch them up! Can you imagine the awesome little girl parties that must have been thrown and been well attended thanks to these enticing invitations?
Recently my son came home confused. They were studying Intelligent Design in school and he had some questions. I was relieved that his school stopped teaching the theory of Evolution, which I never really understood. I once saw a movie that tried to explain evolution but it just got me more confused. It showed a bunch of apes in the desert who were starving and then this black obelisk appeared out of nowhere and they started using bones to kill animals for meat and then each other and then one of them threw a bone up in the air and it turned into a space ship. It didn't make a lot of sense to me and that's why I was glad when our local school board decided to stop teaching this theory.
The next step was consulting the Mother Ship, aka, I Heart Organizing. Jen's blog is a huge source of organizing inspiration and ideas. I think I made the most out of this little corner, without cluttering up the Breakfast Room.
To make the list relevant regardless of the goal, this current incarnation has been renamed the “Medal Watch List”. Since in essence that is what is being monitored – our progress towards earning medals in Majors.
Have a wonderful day! May the Fourth be with you! :D
Schmithals argues that Paul’s critics or opponents among the Galatian churches are not “orthodox” judaizers from the Jerusalem leadership of James. I won’t repeat those arguments here but will go through the way of reading the first two chapters of Galatians his arguments opened up to me. What follows is a mixture of Schmithals and my own interpretation, but I conclude with a quotation from Schmithals.
How did I do it? Faithfully practicing the basics. Scales, scales, scales. Boring, boring scales. Memorizing the piece hands separately. Breaking it down by the phrase, then by the note. There is no substitute for getting the basics down. Period. Once you have the fundamentals - I'm talking muscle memory - then you are free to infuse the music with your soul.
3. Ask them if they need anything and assure them that they are the focal point of all your energy. This will allow them to see your utilitarian nature and willingness to help. People want to feel as though your relationship or pending interaction is valuable from your perspective. The goal should be to convey a degree of professional and maturity, regardless of the avenue for connection. It could either be regarding personal matters or even a professional acquaintance; it really doesn’t matter and you should strive to remain affianced nonetheless.
Thursday- Chicken Packets w/pasta and peas
The Sogang Korean Program is one of the most recommended all through the internet. That’s actually the main reason why it made into this sort of top 5 list, because I found the first lessons, the ones on Korean sounds and alphabet, quite bad. And since pronunciation is my biggest problem so far, you may understand why I prefer other resources for that. Still, I liked the way they structured the lessons and I can tell it’ll be quite useful as soon as I get to a higher level of understanding.
Lead striker, Gomez and a 19-year-old Alaba tried from a long distance in desperate attempts and with 23 minutes played, all Bayern players looked too desperate and careless. They were not punished by the inept Madrid side that lacked a cutting edge that saw them win the El Classico 2-1 a few days ago.
Disaster ensues. He humiliates and degrades his faithful queen, who goes into labour and bears a daughter whom he refuses to recognise as his own, and then dies. Leontes sends his courtier Antigonus (Dugald Bruce-Lockhart) to expose the newborn baby in the wilds, ensuring Antigonus' own death (he is eaten by a bear). Meanwhile, Leontes' son Mamillius (Ben Allen) kills himself. There's a bit part appearance by the Oracle at Delphi, who reveals with some unusually direct utterances that Leontes has been wrong all along, and the king falls into grief, despair and regret.
Majority rules in America, and I will honor the concept; however, I will fight with all of my power to be a voice in opposition to Obama and his “goals for America.”
Will anybody ever love me?
my favorite authors are Patricia Cornwell, Sibella Giorello, Brandilyn Collins, Iris Johansen, Diana Gabaldon, and Erica Spindler. They are all terrific writers and have their own great style, so I’m sure even subconsciously I have learned much about writing just by reading their books. I think when I was in my early twenties I wanted to be like Mary Higgins Clark. Her mysteries
I bought this tee when we took my uncle and aunt to the outlet in Carlsbad a few weekends ago. While my brother walked away with bags of stuff, this was the only thing I walked away with and I couldn't be happier. This tee is so easy to wear with everything in my closet. I am addicted to Gap t-shirts, especially ones that are on sale! Some of my striped tees need replacing since I've had some for years and they're starting to show signs of wear and tear. Jen made a good point in one of her recent posts that her style has grown more simple as she continues blogging, and I couldn't help but realize the same. I know that with outfits like this one, my style hasn't changed all that much since I've always been and always will be obsessed with stripes. What has changed is that now I choose what I wear because I love it, because it's comfortable, and because it makes me feel good about myself--versus being bogged down with worries of being trendy or making my outfit more interesting. I am a simple gal, and honestly, it's one of the things I like about myself. I think that's why I always come back to this outfit of a striped tee and a solid skirt.
Which is good, right? Power to the people?
disguising the facts where the masters has roamed
I will give you an example. Two neighbors, two different attitudes. Let’s say there is one neighbor that always plays really loud music on the weekends. Two people can have two totally different perceptions about it. One guy may turn his music down and listen to the neighbors music and realize that he now has a new genre of music he likes because he is flexible. Ever heard the saying if you can’t beat them, join them? In being flexible he expanded his experience and his level of consciousness. The second neighbor may get irritated. He gets into a battle of wills, turns his music up or just complains about the “loud noise” without ever opening up the possibility of a peaceful solution which will help him maintain his happiness. He could possibly move away, but is that not just a temporary solution? What if the next neighbor also plays loud music. Will he move away again? The first neighbor makes an internal adjustment to the external circumstance where the second neighbor makes an external adjustment that can only temporarily fix the problem. Internal adjustments and shifts are so much more powerful than external adjustments and shifts.
One whole egg
KRIS BEAVER
In default.css we change the color of # 444 of text entries (Form. Input) and # 333 of the contents of the tables (table) to # FFF to read well on the new background. In addition we change the background of the ‘paging’ class to transparent.
As I sit here eating my last slice of Carb 0 Bread by Julian’s Bakery, I am slightly relieved. I ordered two loafs, one cinnamon and one plain, thinking even if this bread is ok, it is going to be great. My standards are set low considering I haven’t had gluten in 9 years and Julian’s has put out some pretty yummy products over the years. I still remember when all gluten free bread was pretty gross. I am relieved because I managed to eat it being that it cost me $12.50 a loaf and I wasn’t going to throw both loaves in the trash. I will start from the beginning.
Like The Folding Knife, I initially didn't see a lot of room where the material could be considered inspiring outside of getting the reader thinking and engaged with the book and working on the readers own thoughts and awareness.
an underestimated impression.
Look Away – The Mantles
We have ascertained that the entire web of these transactions was managed by a UBS bank employee at the time, client manager Denis Chua. Chua had originally worked at the Singapore branch for HSBC Hong Kong, where he managed Chia’s account until 2006.
We bought a cheep canvas and painted the edges blue.
A regiment can make a reform action during its activation. The regiment can change its facing freely staying in place, and no further movement is allowed.
I was faced with a situation on Monday, where yes, I admit, my anger flared. I had purchased some collage sheets from a vendor on etsy to use in my art. Vendors who sell their collage sheets generally do so with the purpose of others using them in their art for sale and are fine with that. What they do not want is someone to purchase the sheet and then resell it or parts of it for their own profit. Understandably. It's theft and not only is is wrong and a crime it lacks integrity. I have never, nor would I ever, steal someone else's idea or their art and claim it as my own. Taking away the fact that it's wrong (and I do know wrong from right!), I don't want what someone else did to be "my" work. I have my own creative talent thank you. I may not be able to digitally create the bits and pieces I use (not from lack of imagination...lack of photoshop elements!) but I do have the talent, ability and creativity to design something of my own from the elements I purchase (or images that are offered free of charge for that purpose).
Dip the lip of your glass in the lime juice and then into the mixture of pepper, salt and chili powder. Set aside.
the fact that they can’t afford
Clearly, he’s discovered the answer to his question.
A growing obsession with global warming and “renewable” sources threatens the stability of our supply.
And probably safer than a Cruise Ship.
but I don't care if I ever make a CENT touching the lives of teens.
The past 2 weeks, I have found myself, literally, staying at home with my kids - 24/7. We had the visitation of a very nasty virus (thank you, kindergarten child, for sharing.) Harriet got sick first, missed 3 days of school before the weekend hit, and then Grace picked it up JUST as Harriet was getting better and missed 4 days of school the next week. Even though it was a huge inconvenience to stay home and cancel my 50 things I had planned for both weeks, it was really great to not feel much of a responsibility to anyone or anything else but my kids. (with the exception of Cowboy Max... I did have to cancel on Galloping Grace a few too many times and felt horribly guilty and bad about that.) But, despite my guilty feelings, I think the rest is what keeps me from working right now. I love being available to my girls at the drop of a hat. I really do. It kind of feels even more important now that they ARE gone from the house for most of the day - that when they DO need mom, I'm there. I am really glad that my number one job is "Mom" and that nothing eclipses that or pulls me in the opposite direction. I feel very grateful and lucky that David does make enough to make ends meet and that we are both in agreement that the "extras" just aren't worth it for us. I'm not saying I won't leave room to adjust things later, but for now, this feels right.
There are rumors coming out that may change the video game world forever. But not in a good way. Microsoft and Sony are both considering banning the use of used games.
There is all kinds of things I have to worry about....and apparently am.
Now that I'm older and am totally landlocked, I realize that I never took full advantage of living in that little town. One of the things that I missed all three years that I lived there was Christmas in July. The houses (beautiful houses that were held to high standards given the Historical Society's guidelines) would pull out all of the Christmas decorations and go all out. It makes sense...why waste all of that Christmas loveliness just once a year. Why not do it twice?
the dogs romp and wrestle and run
Thus I do not admit to my perfection because I want to accommodate other people, their minds and ideas of themselves and of me and of what I ought to think of myself! Also a great reluctance to confront and have a conflict with other human minds. That is why I can’t teach. A teacher would not be afraid to correct the errors of students or to debate with others.
At this point I add in my images. Sometimes I draw, sometimes I cut out--normally its a combination of both. I had this photo from the library of congress archives of these three babies that I liked so I decided to use it. I played around a bit with layout and decided to cut them out individually rather than use the whole photo. I sprayed the wings and cut out the flowers and petals, the stems were drawn on.
You managed to teach a member of your family the behavior you want him to display in specific situations. Men and women can be trained the same way. It requires time and a lot of effort, but the results it will yield are well worth it. It is hard, at times, to ignore less than desirable behavior. Like a dog taking a poop in the middle of your living room floor, some negative behavior has to be addressed. But also like Sparky dropping his load onto your floor, it has to be done at the time of the incident. Otherwise, the lesson is lost and he (read: we) will not fully comprehend what was done wrong. But the next time Sparky goes potty outside, clap your hands, give him a lot of lovin’ and maybe even a little doggie treat.
Whole-wheat pasta with tomatoes, feta and olives
A short-term loan is as bad as a long--
And by that I mean those stars on the walk--
Check out pics of Justin’s new place (below).
I’ll attempt some more in a few days, when my tastebuds have recovered. In the meantime, the following post is for the bolognese sauce I made for dinner last night. It’s a staple in our house, or has become one since we’ve had kids. Unlike the cupcakes, it turned out really well.
Stinging yellow sunshine
I laughed that poor Buddha shouldn't have to sit on the floor of the backseat like this. It seems.... disrespectful. But we didn't want the Buddha to flop around in the backseat, so we placed the Buddha on the floor for safe-keeping.
When you have your two sides of the pillow cover sewn up and ready to assemble, it’s time to tackle the zipper. Zipper installation is all new to me. I’ve never done one before and it was surprisingly simple – although most of the credit goes to the zipper foot on the sewing machine! I fumbled my way through the first zipper by guessing at each step, but then, after a little googling, found a super helpful video tutorial. You should definitely take the time to watch this before you attempt your first zipper (also the ladies have British accents which makes them even more awesome).
You’re still around to write this letter to me
We are taken care of by two Italian cooks as we stay in apartments remodeled from a 15th Century Monastery.
The people I celebrated the love and hope of God with is what made the difference in these services, but it just wasn’t their presence. I’ve been to a lot of rock concerts and sometimes I have to look hard to find differences in some of church services I’ve been to. Let me explain. Do concert goer’s participate in the concert? No, when you go to a concert you observe, your entertained, your involved emotionally, the performer connects with you, and maybe you even feel like together you transcend the performance and realize something more beautiful or revelatory than just the show. This isn’t the heart of worship because the beauty of our communal celebrations is that we are all empowered by grace to participate. This participation is not receiving an emotional high, but by celebrating Christ through the unity of the community. This is why historically worship is more than just the music. The Holy Spirit in all of us is a declaration to participate in prayer, in prophecy, in the communion, in affirmation, rebuke, correction, and a dozen other ways. The services that were most life changing where not focused on one worship leader or a sermon, but on how all of us together glorify the Lord. These were the moments of prayer for one another, in reading the Scriptures together (needs a whole other post), sharing testimony and needs, confession, in sharing meals, especially taking the Lord’s meal together (also another post). Even learning something as a group is special compared to alone. It wasn’t about getting to a place where I felt like I was alone with God in heaven, but it was in embracing who I was with, at the throne of God. This is why there is such value in our liturgies, creeds, and prayers. All of us, not just a Pastor or worship leader, are invited to lead and join in the service. It’s like attending a Yankee game and then being asked to join the batting order. There should be nothing passive about attending church.
“Don’t worry dear blogger, your effort was great
Writing is half the battle; the other half is selling.***
Březňák pale lager is a fine beer, and I have been drinking it now and then from 2 litre PET bottles that are great to take home from the Czech Republic. As a draught beer, Březňák was a new experience. The golden beer had some carbonation and a medium sized head. I felt grass and malts in the nose, while the grass was assertive in the mouth. The finish was a little bit watery with some caramel. I liked this beer, and I feel that it would be a wonderful session beer.
7. Control. Skating has taught me how to be deliberate in my execution of specific skating elements as well as how to better control my emotions and interactions with people. There are crucial little details about skating elements that can make or break a move. Extending your arm a certain way gives you better torque for your spins; how you place your toe pick in the ice affects the height of your jumps; and just the slightest deviation can cause you to do the element incorrectly. You have to envision what you are doing and be aware of your entire self. It’s a great lesson to apply to how you do things in life too. Think about what you’re doing. Follow the steps. Don’t cut corners or be oblivious. Then try to focus on what you’re doing on a crowded rink of skaters who are whirling around you. Don’t get frustrated. Don’t act rude or impatient with others. Keep your attitude in check. Set a good example for the kids who look up to you. Ignore divas and people who act like they’re better than you. Don’t compare your ability with others who are different and have different circumstances than you. These are all lessons I learned inside the rink that I apply to life off the ice as well. But again, with control as well as with other things in life and skating, practice makes perfect.
I love the KI kits - Taylor makes it super easy to create coordinating cards and projects and has both card stock, embellishments, DP that all coordinate together and come with a great storage container so that after you are done - you can can keep all the ingredients together in one place (and having only a corner to stamp in which is in our bedroom, that is awesome!!) The February kit uses the My Mind's Eye 6x6 paper pad (a whole paper pad with ingredients to coordinate!!! Wow!!!) This is a close up of the card - I paired it with the Layering Doily Die - Large: from Taylored Expressions:
So, I’ve decided to settle on an art that I have an interest in and also one that is taught in many locations across the USA. I really don’t want to spend time in another esoteric art — only to end up moving in six months and have to start over. I figure that if I do end up moving I can just find another dojo and not loose too much. So, what is that art?
I felt like a small bird trapped in it's Nostalgia.....
When we were done, I started to roll up my mat and noted that I wished I could do yoga every day.
O bull among men, that intelligent one (puruSa) who is untroubled by these and treats comfort and sadness alike he becomes capable of the concept/idea (tatva) of immortality!
The Holy Spirit answered by leading the pastor up a mountain path and through the forest. When he stopped at the edge of a well-known terrorist village, Kata couldn’t believe it. This paramilitary group often killed or terrorized Christians in a nationalist effort to keep India strictly Hindu. To make matters worse, one of the most feared leaders lived in this village. He destroyed churches, beat or raped Christians and even killed them.
I haven't read much about them yet, but from what I can tell from my quick glance is that they're just a concept at this point. Aesthetically, I love them. And they're Nike, which you know is my fave label. But I have very little pointe experience myself, so I hesitate to form an opinion from a dance perspective quite yet. I'm very curious to know my ballet prof's thoughts, of course, as well as other dancers out there...?
If you are coming to CHA, be sure to visit our booth and see the new tape. If you are not going to make it to California, check with your local Copic supplier to purchase tape for yourself. Tape is now in stock and has started shipping!
This Chanel eye cream really does deliver. I put it on right when I wake up, and the puffiness diminishes. It isn't the most hydrating, so I usually have to layer a richer cream on top, but for something that helps me not to look like Rocky Balboa, I'm okay with layering.
Functional programs are relatively easy to parallelize. However, pure functional languages have not been very successful.
Now I'll be on the hunt for some over the knee socks, Hunter boots to pair them with, floral dresses, intricately knit cardigans, and I might just be breaking out my red lipstick after a possibly unmerited hiatus...
Simple Syrup
Comparative Analysis 17
For me it was that bastion of ridiculous self-awareness and over-sized sweaters, Dawson’s Creek.
I looked at the pictures and thought yeah, she's quite attractive. Not a complete stunner but certainly not unattractive. But I was more angry at the Mail for accepting and publishing yet another anti-woman article written, yet again, by a woman.
and the seed be blasted in the planting.
Incidentally, that really is the important bit - though it's not at all clear whether Brew Dog actually realise this, such is the emphasis on the aforementioned public image.
When my mother then my sister picked up the book, I began to feel like there was a Game of Thrones plague about and I was determined not to catch it. Yet there was a whisper on the wind and it said,
I NEVER EXPECTED PERSONAL INVOLVEMENT
The latest existing home sales data was disappointing. However, the sales are being help back by something we did not think would happen this year–lower inventory levels. If short sales continue to rise, which means foreclosures don’t hit the markets as we think they will–could this portend a surge in building this year? The constructuion jobs created would spur further recovery. Read the following articles from CNN/Money which are on point:
2011 Accent Homes Agent
"Do you think you'll have time to read it? I have to blog about it in a week."
Gregory: what will you do when you lose
1252 D-VIII/31(A)/1996. “Aurel Kolnai and Richard Rorty.” The Unraveling of Reason in Contemporary Affairs Panel (with Ralph Hancock, Peter Lawler, Daniel Mahoney, and Charles R. Kesler), Claremont Institute for the Study of Statesmanship, Annual Convention, American Political Science Association, San Francisco, California.
Laurajtaylor2010 - 18
PS. You will be happy to know that the Hate Crimes Bill was signed into law just three hours ago.
Outdoors both dogs are super playful with each other. Full of non-stop mixture of little barks and lots of chasing.
3. Staying above the Republican Presidential candidates ‘fray’.
So, lately I've been overwhelmed by the tiny, miniscule daily things that imbue my life with beauty and grace. Almost every time I say to myself, "I'm going to write a post about that" and then the time slowly drip drops away and there's no post. So to make up for my severe tardiness I'm just going to list my favorite things. Like David Letterman I'm going to do my Top 10 in reverse order. Here goes:
that the message of the Lord
Occasionally we run into challenges finding just the right pieces in stock in Saskatoon, for a designer this can be a huge problem. But, what we can’t find locally we manage to find online, through catalogues or have custom made. One way or another, we get what we want.
So, set your DVRs, watch, and then come back here to discuss how the picks worked out for you.
I won't bore you with a travelogue, per se. I'll just give a few impressions of my trip.
WHY RENT THIS: Yimou is one of the most striking visual directors of our time. Some broad laughs.
Okay, it hasn’t been as big of a let down as the Chuck Klosterman fiasco. The Gods of Mars is a good book. It’s just a lot of unnecessary detail that I don’t need and a lot of exposition. I know I have said that books can get the Stephen King Syndrome as I like to put it, where this is a reoccurring issue, and I think this is true for the Barsoom series. That’s what’s taking me so long to finish this one. I think the plot is really interesting. I like that it picks up a little in the future from where Princess of Mars left off and the following book comes in directly after where this one finishes. I don’t really want to give anything away but basically John Carter, Prince of Helium in the House of Jeddak whoever or whatever he says (Or as we like to say, Captain John Carter of Vir-gin-yah! You can’t tell me that wasn’t one of the funniest things in the movie) is searching for Dejah Thoris, the hottie princess of Helium, with the help of some various secondary characters (including everyone’s favorite Thark, Tars Tarkas). Anyway, the plot is cool but they must have really liked detail back in the day because that’s what’s killing it for me. I’ve only got 50 pages left and those are going to done by the end of the weekend (Hopefully. Finals may kill that plan). I was really into the whole Phaidor (or whatever that chick’s name was) and Thuvia being in love with John Carter and his cute little Confederate butt trying to explain–unsuccessfully–that Dejah Thoris is the only woman John Carter loves. Here’s hoping Warlords of Mars is not a let down.
Drag: Herb?
When we parted company with him and made for the much cooler smoking patio, we happened upon the aforementioned Canadian adventurers and told them many tales of dildos and lube accidentally left where everyone could see. It was still Mardi Gras for me so I gave all three of them beads and FINALLY got to see some exposed chests.
Whatever you have been led to believe, the agave spirit of Mexico is becoming quality-driven and sophisticated, produced by second and third generation Tequileros across Jalisco, Nayarít and Michoacan. We are now talking about tequilas being barrel aged and low production artisanal products. We are not dealing with shooters here. These are sipping Tequilas on par with Scotch and Bourbon.
If you don't want your regular email address to show, create a new email address just for blogging!!
Once again, another knock out in the back! THIS is why I just had to add another tee to my collection! I absolutely adore the cut out back with the three super cute bows flowing down the center beautifully! This top was marked down and an additional 50% off! It totaled $6.50!
The film opens with a landslide blocking the route, and a wreck train crew is dispatched to scene . When it is discovered that more men were needed, the railroad boss, played by the Late Alan Roscoe (1886-1933) spy’s some hobo’s in one of the boxcars on the blocked train. It is later discovered that one of the Hobo’s, who picked a fight with Jim (The Boss), is a former Locomotive Engineer who was let go for not doing what he was told. As the movie progress’s, the engineer, Larry Doyle (Played by the Late Robert Armstrong, 1890-1973) is hired by the boss as a locomotive engineer, and he ends up falling in love with the Boss’s fiancée, Mary, who is played by the late Jean Arthur (1900-1991)
7. Bury the past.Stop bringing up the past. Gals..don't bring up the happy things about u and your ex to your guy, it would jus make him jealous or unhappy. And guys, don't talk about the happy times that u had with your ex or mention about her in your every other sentence as it would make your gal feel un-happy and she might think that u saying all this b'cos u are gonna get back with your ex or not interested in her anymore.
It is that time of day
Running shoes :)
Among the DDDB program services listed in the Form 990: held community forums, organized rallies, developed outreach programs, assisted/solicited other bids and plans, filed lawsuits, identified and recruited an advisory board, organized tenants, made presentations, and waged a media campaign.
I smile at my enemies,
So, two more tips for how to pilot your life (personal or business) are:
I have a dream.....a rather materialistic dream. I know, I should be dreaming of world peace and happiness but I am dreaming about my home.
Pants, panties, drawers, briefs, undies, passion killers; call them what you like, but it’s always been knickers for me.
It cannot shatter hope.
Will’s grass fed beef is grass fed. Period. And, now, lucky for us, White Oak Pastures is raising chickens and applying the same principles of humane animal husbandry and land stewardship to poultry.
I want to add to my collection. I guess this is a weird thing to collect, but the only other artist I've been this obsessed with (more for his looks than his music, even though he's a genius) was Bowie and I don't have any bowie themed tags.
I cannot even express how wrong this is.
1/2 ounce lemon juice
spiced rose hip and olive oil cake
Emma Darwin: A Victorian Life by James D. Loy and Kent M. Loy Biography of Mrs. Charles Darwin that ultimately fails to make the reader feel they know Emma. A great deal of time was clearly spent in reading archived family letters, tracking the many and evolving family relations (yes, I had to slip that word in here somewhere), and the authors do a good job of recreating the social, financial, and political world the Darwins and their family and friends inhabited. But Emma did not leave a diary, and did not confide her inner thoughts in her letters, so the reader ends the biography with no greater insight than that Emma was a wealthy woman who loved her children and her husband, liked music and spent her widowhood reading. The closest to a meaty issue covered in the book is that Emma and Charles held very different views on religion at the start of their marriage, but by the end, Emma had somehow changed her beliefs to mirror her husband's a bit more. But that change isn't well charted. Nor is how she contributed, by editing, to her husband's scientific writing. I'd have loved to see facsimilies of his writings, with her editorial comments or marks, to see how she contributed to his famous books. Her impressions of great scientists who were friends of her husbands, people like Charles Lyall, the father of geology; Huxley; and others are amusing, but superficial. Way too much of the book is spent discussing daily gastrointestinal information that Emma recorded for her children and Charles. A section discussing how Emma was very concerned with her family's health, with some examples, would have sufficed. Page after page and year after year, and chapter after chapter, of reading "C poorly" was a great waste of paper. The photos were nice, and the brief summary of the childrens' lives after their parents deaths was good, but the authors left out some of the other important people, like the Darwin's grandson who lived with them for many years, and just disappears from the story after he attains his adulthood. And how many descendants do Charles and Emma have? The authors thank one for his help, but it might have been nice to say "At the time of printing, Charles and Emma were survived by XX descendants." Some interesting insights onto Charles Darwin are provided, and anyone researching his life would find this an interesting addition to flesh out his character (especially his thoughts on marriage). What I remember several weeks later is that the Darwins were very affluent, which I hadn't known. Otherwise, Emma remains just another Victorian wife and mother, and I don't feel I know anything about her at all.
Maybe he's just playing a trick on me. Maybe he just wants to have some time to himself. Maybe he will realize what a mistake he is making by breaking it off with me.
The investigators are trying to establish whether the cut was self-inflicted, or if Teoh was coerced into cutting his wrist, or if the injuries were sustained during the fall.
We wanted to make one last run to the beach before moving home. And the ONLY weekend it worked was Mother's Day weekend and Sadie's Gotcha Day! Hooray!!
I began this project with a strong sense that I had to stop worrying. I knew it was a waste of time. I’ve learned that God warned against it over and over. I’ve learned it is a sin, that it is disobedient to worry, and that it shows a lack of trust in God.
You want to be treated well. You want to be loved. You want be pursued. You want to be told that you are beautiful, that you are important, special, worthwhile. You want to not only be told these things, but to feel them. You want a man to treat you like a queen. Do you really think that men don’t want these things as well? Don’t need these things as well? Every man from 15 to 95 wants to be told that he is handsome, that he is skilled at what he does, that he is a worthwhile person. Ladies, your job is not to be pursued, but to pursue in return.
Finally after a long few days of traveling and some time to think, Addison reached Pargon. She wanted to rent a car and drive to the manor but she only had enough money to take a small tour bus to the small historic city the manor was close to.
If you meet the criteria of a home based business you have the option to claim the occupancy costs of your home. This may include rent or mortgage interest, council rates, utilities, house insurance and repairs. To be able to claim these occupancy costs you must meet the “Interest Deductibility Test” which is the second criteria.
My bedroom was the focus of some serious additions, but it had to made into an "L" shape to fit with the rest of the house, which makes maneuvering it a little awkward sometimes.
You back? Pretty great mamas, eh? You're welcome.
Some might claim that I do not like the Premier League because Forest have been out of it for so long, and there may be some truth in that, but it is not the biggest part by any means. The introduction of the Premier League has unbalanced everything through finance, governance and competition and then exported that to some degree to every league below.
Life insurance is ideal in creating the cash that can be invested to produce income for a family. When people have few assets that is when they need life insurance the most. The cost is just pennies on the dollar anually.For a 40-year-old the cost is somewhere between 1/2 of 1% to 2 % annually of the sum insured depending upon the plan selected.
Good luck to the prison population of the West, as your Internet and freedoms go dark.
Laws' former girlfriend, ex-prostitute Jacqueline Sperling, has been served with court papers by one-time friend Debbie Brown - an Auckland accountant who was also once seen out and about with the radio host.
Steve Harley & Cockney Rebel Sebastian UK
Making us happy with rich hues and zero hazard is the Ginger + Liz brand reason for being.
I was never able to make a drawing, if in the last years I had a pencil in my hand it was only for another purpose. I can not tel the anxiety I had during the first lesson, I was on the point of getting up and abandon. But Brunella, serene and smiling, encouraged us to practice, saying that ‘You can learn anything’. It was difficult to believe her. Yesterday afternoon I devoted myself to drawing, a little ashamed and uncertain.
Do they really mean these fulsome compliments? (A rare correct use of 'fulsome'). Or are they thinking "Fuck me, who let the dogs out?"
I've been reading (and re-reading) the Journals of Alfred Doten as part of researching my Western Mysteries stories set in and around Virginia City in the early 1860s. Like Mark Twain, Alf Doten was a failed prospector turned journalist. Throughout his life he kept meticulous and detailed journals, recounting the weather, cost of things and concrete details of life in the California gold fields and later on the Comstock, in Nevada.
A strand running through all my pieces thus far is that the SNP probably undershot in the number of candidates it fielded in 2007, but I realise, I've done nothing to justify this in terms of evidence. So ponder this. Compare the 2007 regional vote for Holyrood with how the self-same set of voters cast their ballots in the simultaneous local election. In 2011, the SNP won 39.8% of the Glaswegian regional vote to Labour's 35%. While the SNP won its first parliamentary plurality in 2007, Glasgow continued stubbornly to prefer Labour, who won 38.2% of the regional vote, to the SNP's 27%. In brute numerical terms, Labour outpolled the Nats by just over 23,000 votes. But notice that the widening gap recorded between the two parties in the simultaneous local poll held using STV. I've knocked together these two graphs, representing the differences.
11. The Last Laugh
The reality of slavish coil doesn’t depend on whistles.
(From "Phrases & Reality")
P.S. I've got a sweet little giveaway coming up that involves some cute items from Elsie Flannigan's Red Velvet Art shop so stay tuned ;)
Linda and Mary Dawn xxx
Canon Powershot SX10IS 10MP Digital Camera
I would first like to introduce you to one of my favorite journalists, Alexander Nazaryan. He writes for the NY Daily News. His articles, I think, are both intelligent and well-written. On 21 Febraury 2012, he wrote a blog entry on David Foster Wallace’s birthday. Had DFW not killed himself in 2008, he would’ve been 50 in 2012.
So anyhoo...a few months ago, when I was hurting pretty bad financially, I won a gift card to Starbucks from one of my favorite bloggers. Linny's Vault, who reminds me a lot of myself at her age, and who I think may be the only other person I know who will publicly admit to truly loving her t.v. shows, ran a little Starbucks giveaway in February. And she did it because someone else had done something nice for her. I was the lucky sap who won, and believe me, I couldn't get my ass to Starbucks fast enough to treat myself.
Well, time to eat some breakfast and get ready for my run. 8 miles today and in the 70+ degree weather!! This is insane!! We are getting May weather in March. LOVE IT!!! Hope you have a wonderful day :D
judging by their adult male giddiness, they had a blast. nate (who i will from now on refer to as mario - as in giant stach nintendo mario) walked away with the "movember stache of the year award." whoa. i have to admit driving the five of them home in the wee hours of the morning was a total riot.
Fear is a commonly used weapon to create panic and opposition. It becomes a medical and social issue when it leads to phobia.
One last thing, can anyone suggest to the GOP, on the number of things they need to address coming into the HOUSE Majority, to investigate and reform Fannie - FREDDIE?
“Marge give me the FUCKING NEEDLE!” I screamed.
In a small bowl mix together the brown sugar and spices. Melt the butter over low heat, then pour into the bowl and mix thoroughly.
Luxury Exterior Home Designs
But the mastermind has died and he has left behind a fortune to go to the lucky gamer who can find the "easter egg" embedded in his most elaborate game. The world is full of skilled gamers, all of whom work toward the prize. And among these gamers are a group of corporate stooges who want to seize the OASIS and start charging a monthly fee for its use--a fee most present users can't afford to pay. "It's never been properly monetized," is the explanation.
The wind didn’t get any better neither, by lunch time the felt from the shed room at the house on the back was near on vacated that particular shed, surprised ours didn’t come off, however it did stay put. The fences were shaking, little trees were bending and the rain was pelting down. To be honest I think that hail last week was a bit easier to bear than if we had been out in that weather of today.
If there are no challenges, may I suggest that if and when you get a chance, will you please share your recently published art work? a page made with a newly discovered tool that works wonders? how about a layout with a newly discovered technique? something about a new love, a new member of the family, of places you've been; or perhaps something that made you proud you made one but there is no one to say, "good job"? I'm sure you will always find someone to give you a big pat on the back!
And yet Antichrist is also masterfully crafted and psychologically deep. The repulsive and unsettling character of the film’s imagery and action hammers home a profoundly nihilistic message that is cosmic in scope, and which is depressing precisely because of its difficult truth. This message is that nature is vicious, and that humans, even though we want to forget it, are a part of nature. As a part of nature, the only thing that keeps us from tearing one another apart is our uncanny ability to repress and sublimate our deepest urges and drives. Without this ability, civilization would be impossible, and yet, ironically, it is because of repression that we are doomed to experience self-alienation and despair. We are a part of nature, but we must pretend that we are not if we hope to hold onto such things as human dignity, moral law and social order. In order to live with one another peacefully, we must deny who we really are.
I just love the cover for this book, it is so graceful and beautiful! I also like the fact that it's not super literal-- like, hey here's a book about mermaids, let's slap a picture of a mermaid on the cover! Instead, it's much more suggestive of what the story is actually about (which I won't give away, you'll just have to read it!) The flowing white dress also really stands out against the dark water background. So pretty!
Well, it seems like a better day today, we may even venture into the garden today and do a bit of tidying. The dandelions are beginning to take over again. I have been living in a lurgy filled house for the past week and a half. Both Xander and Kell have been poorly with flu/cold/cough but fortunately I have managed to avoid getting it. Xander had the week off nursery so he has been climbing the walls to get out a bit the last couple of days and driving us nuts, hence the need to get into the garden today, I just hope the weather holds.
The full story, apparently: Helen Cushing was unable to enjoy sex, and told her husband that it would be alright if he wanted to seek satisfaction elsewhere. This understanding was gradually stretched until Cushing was rogering girls in the bedroom upstairs while his wife did the housework downstairs. Then, on her death bed, she told him he’d broken her heart and she could never forgive him.
1 heaped tsp mustard powder
The only thing more delicious than lying for food’s sake, and being caught, was having the Chef take a bow and step over to our table!
'Something better change', as the Stranglers snarled.
The essence of autism
Another day, another chance for the BLS to fudge jobs data by revising last week’s claims miss to an even worse number: sure enough last week’s -428K drop was just revised to -432K. Which means that this week’s consensus miss, which was at 420K, is irrelevant, with the weekly number coming at 423K because all headlines will blare than claims actually declined by 9K. The game has become so old (and we mean old: the BLS has been doing this very same fudge for 2 years in a row now) we are stunned anyone falls for it. And one thing that will also most certainly be ignored is that the 423K number is really 427K because as the BLS reported, a -3,776 drop in claims in Texas was due to “Fewer layoffs due to holiday” – well the holiday is over. Lastly, and most troubling for the economy is that another massive 103,000 people dropped off extended benefit claims in one week. Just as troubling is that 1.7 million people have dropped off the government’s dole in the past year as can be seen in the chart below: these are people that haven’t gotten a job, they have just stopped being counted by the govt.
Well that's it from me!! Thanks so much for stoppin' by for a little Stamps 'n' Coffee!
The music industry was the first to be existentially disrupted by the web and therefore it has had the most time to re-group. It was also the first media industry to get spanked by Apple so I guess they figured they couldn’t afford more friends like these so they better sort themselves out.
7. By the way, all those females knit, too. Although my oldest daughter likes to crochet. The traitor.
by Helen Steiner Rice
Then it was time to leave the village wedding and head east to Sivas for the groom's side to have a wedding party. This is the farthest east in Turkey I had been so far. Five hours farther east is the town of Erzurum and after that comes Armenia. The Sivas party was a little different than the village wedding in that it was inside, there was no meal, and company was mixed. Other than that, it was fairly typical. We danced folk dances, guests (friends and family) pinned gold on the bride and groom and we ate cake.
Great race. Based in my age group 37th place out of 50. I placed 380/530 women. Not too shabby for a middle aged overweight gal. I may not have won time wise, but I didn't see another sparkle skirt at the race. I think I came in first for sparkliest!
I am sitting at home this evening, not feeling very well. I think it's one of those things where you have a slight relief of academic pressure and your body shuts down. Fun.
This operation might lead to some devices being suppressed from VxVM’s view
After about fifteen minutes he went over and complained to his wife, “they said there is something wrong with our luggage, it has been taken by security to be checked, can you believe it?”
A The Dubliners
Director: Árni Sveinsson
First things first on Tuesday I got to go to lunch with Jacquie, her husband and my mom. This was Jacquie and I's second time meeting for lunch. She is so much fun. It's so nice being around her. Conversation is always so easy. She is a breath of fresh air. We started talking about when I lost 100 pounds I sky dived. Steve then piped up he was hooked in the conversation then, so as she mentioned in her blog Steve will be sky diving with me in March. I can't wait. He got so excited just talking about it, as did I. My mom thought they were great people. It was such a wonderful time. Jacquie gave me some pants. It is always nice getting gifts. Can't wait to see you again Jacquie hope ya'll can make it to the cookout.
the priests at whose Masses I assisted;
I'm not a Caroline Ingalls, Olivia Walton, or June Cleaver. I've disappointed my friends, my Lord, and my husband at times. I feel that disappointment today and it wrenches my heart. Loneliness, fear and heartbreak set in.
Um, yeah. This show is daring and has pushed the format of the sitcom more than any show since Arrested Development. Any additional episodes produced, I consider a blessing.
All in all quite a nice beer.
Gösta Berling’s the worst kind of screw-up: the talented kind. He was the best preacher his parishioners ever heard. He cared about them. But he was also a drunk, who emptied a bottle every night and found truth at the bottom. And so Gösta (Lars Hanson) got defrocked. Such was a deep-drinking, deep-thinking lad’s fate in 19th-century Sweden.
Parissi later became a disk jockey in Wheeling, West Virginia.
2) Some bread puddings are on the drier side – especially the part that's directly exposed to the heat in the oven. Some are on the moist side. This recipe makes a moist, old-style bread pudding.
I talk. This voice feels unused.
It has been awhile since I have done any horse drawings. Here are a couple of shots of my latest piece. This Mustang mare is at the Oregon Holding Facility. I really love this position she is in and she is a beautiful colored bay. I hope someone adopts her soon. She has such a kind eye.
These days, Le Fida is hosting live music again and the Soumano brothers are back on the bill. Their music still careens, but times have changed. The neighborhood of Lafiabougou borders what is now called ACI 2000. It is an up-and-coming area with luxury hotels and mansions that cater to Bamako’s nouvou riche and their Franco-American counterparts. As Bamako’s center of gravity shifts, bars like Le Fida and Club Djembe are no longer escapes on the outskirts, but grimy time capsules defiantly dug into a new Bamako. This new Bamako is yet to arrive, and one has to wonder if it ever will, but it is clear that places like Le Fida are operating on borrowed time.
B: "Mommy, that baby needs a bath"
Control of the government passed to the African National Congress (ANC), which was fighting a revolutionary war for much of the century. Since then, South Africa has been ruled by the ANC, and year by year the ANC comes more and more to resemble the former apartheid regime.
well as in Puntland and Somaliland that are determined not to fall to that ideology. Meles concluded that he looks forward to many more conversations and communications on this topic.
Okay, yeah, sure, it's Groundhog Day. It's the day when we celebrate the prescient powers of Marmota monax, which is a mixture of Latin and Greek meaning "lonely fatass ground squirrel". In case you were curious (and I know that you weren't), if it ends in an -x, it's typically a Greek word.
activity is a burden, but replace "should" with "want"
That's why I have always been an advocate for meditation or really any methods that will help relax the body and destress the mind...
And now I'm here twiddling my thumbs. I so bad want to jump right in and reread what I've written. To see if I wrote 38K of junk or if it makes sense or if it is all a bunch of gibberish.
I COULD have put my son in a crib. I COULD have hired a baby nurse or a sitter. I COULD have sleep trained him or weaned him before he was clearly ready. I could have offered him cereal before he was ready with the hopes of getting sleep, but didn’t. I COULD have parented him based on MY need and not his. WHY? Why push away his needs and his communication for my own good? I’m raising a conscious boy, aware of his feelings, confident in his ability to communicate. … and I love it… and him! Childhood is precious and so short. My sacrifice for my children… SO WORTH IT! Pay now, not later (Fingers crossed).
As the number one natural nutrition company in the U.S., we've been on a mission to make people healthier. And we've made it part of our job to make the planet healthier along the way.
Otami...Mako Hattori
They talked about ideas and came up with a solution
Ah well, only 365 days to next year's anniversary. Damn that Leap year day.
Saturday, February 3rd–I watched “Venus.”
I have been a reader of Country Living Magazine since 1976ish
Brooks then compares what he calls the Affordable Care Act's concentration of cost-control power into a board of fifteen experts with the Republican laissez-faire model, which opposes top-down decision making (at least from the government). Rep. Paul Ryan's proposal to finance U.S. health care with a "premium support system" would replace fee-for-service medicine (in fact, it would not):
I think it has made finding work easier for me. I only apply for jobs that I have an interest in, or at least a reason for applying, like it helps me save up for a goal. My enthusiasm comes out and I find it increases my likelihood of getting the job.
I think of that each time I see a dogwood tree.
But, first things first, and that’s the abolition of the monarchy as a whole, along with a Queen who, unlike her father, cares not the tiniest shit for the welfare of her people, and when that happens it really is time to sweep them all away. The French did it in blood and terror. Being British I would hope we can find a more civilised way – so maybe it’s time for a referendum, to see if we can, especially given the widespread lack of interest, according to the media, in the Jubilee?
I will tell you this card was nice to make. I had to challenge myself to pick colors that actually looked gold and cream (if you would like to learn how to color in these tones Suzanne’s classes are great!). I used Gilli Angel for this project. Gilli was colored with copic markers. I have to practice some more on these combos, but on the top of everything I got some goo coming out of my xpress paper..humm. Is this happening with you guys?
We venture forth here into a brief but frank discussion of what the future is likely to hold if Muslims continue to flood into Britain, colonize its town and cities, spit on its people and way of life, and suck the blood out of its economy. Few would choose to stare so intently into the crystal ball of ethno-sectarian violence. But that is precisely why we feel we must.
Total Depravity (also known as Total Inability and Original Sin)
Bridget, your presence and words were even more important after years of repeated professional horizontal violence in this country. Very similar at times to that of, the professional violation that we witnessed during the Annual General Meeting at this conference.
enough
And a little embarrassing, but I have to submit one of my own blog posts for this. I haven't a clue as to how to pick which one. If a post I have written has stuck in your head, please let me know that, too. It can be on anything.
necklace — thrifted
He remained active well into his 80s, releasing a CD called “Lullabies of Birdland” as well as a memoir, “Lullaby of Birdland,” in early 2004. In March of that year, though, he was hospitalized after suffering a fall at his home. It took him months to recover, and he largely retired from public appearances after that.
11.Sigma Miss Taylor Kabuki:Used to apply powder, foundation or blush. Whatever I feel like at the day.
To comfort, or simply to care.
This brief lapse of time when my involvement on wordpress was considerably less, I started reading once again and that too maniacally; completely the three hunger games books in one go. It helped me to get my mind off from the upcoming results. And yes, now I am well done with the 11th grade; my result being pretty decent which made me happy.
A very satisfying day, indeed!
I have noticed it's causing me to think about things a lot more, making me focus my thoughts and try and wrestle them into some sort of cohesive and presentable shape. I still don't know what sort of poet I am (if you ever actually know) so I'm just throwing everything at it. It's a boon when something happens to you during the day as it gives you something to grab onto, but I do enjoy just sitting down and writing till something appears. It also means I'm actually committing to something and so far have managed to sit down and write something everyday. I wrote my first drunk poem the other night and even though it's pretty poor, I'm rather proud I did it. I wish now I'd left in all the spelling mistakes and mis-typed wobbly bits.
Leave it below!
….and I hope I find out
She then carried her full cereal bowl back to the table, and sat it down gingerly.
Anyway after however long the Starling returned and discovered his home had been invaded. Of course he would have none of that, and pushed the can out. I do believe he was quite surprised to find my Husband sitting a few feet away. The Starling cocked his head to the side and studied my Husband, the Husband cocked his head to the side and studied the bird, and after careful consideration the Starling decided it was wise to make his home somewhere else. But of course that was only one battle. The war still wages.
First up we have some of the Regular Unity Design Team Members..
No, I don’t wanna see my Mumma cry
In the fourth week of May, it’s all fun. That’s all it is. It’s a time to relax, rejoice, sing a lot of songs, enjoy yourself. But the planet itself, the earth itself will be experiencing something really beautiful. You’ll be hearing about some new things, perhaps new species, perhaps new births. It’ll all be fascinating tales of the planet itself. Some of it will be very colorful.
I know I still owe people emails and exchanges, as well as pictures for blogs and stuff - not to mention the Travelling Stitcher pattern, and my freebie patterns. And I was beginning to get a handle on stuff, as one of the stresses in my life got to a bearable place.
Taken from Prayers for All Occasions by Ian Black
“Your shoes, Ian!”
Different Applications Of Appian Illuminator
I am 100 percent disabled according to the federal government. It’s funny because ever since they “deemed” me disabled, I have been desperately trying NOT to be disabled. First off, I have no typical weeks. There is nothing “typical” about me. I get up and make sure the kids get ready for school and on the bus. I find a little something to eat for breakfast and take a handful of meds. If I am extremely tired I lie down and take a nap. My days start slow. I am stiff and sore. It usually takes two hours to become productive. I clean as much of the house I can while everyone is gone to school and work. How much I get done depends on how much energy I have and whether or not my sugar level crashes (thanks to the pancreas!). I study photography lessons for an hour or two, or if I have editing to do, I will do that instead. When they get home at 3:30, I start cooking supper and clean up the kitchen. If I have errands to run, I usually do it around 4:30 so I have someone with me in case I need them. Then I spend an hour or two on the couch relaxing and getting caught up on the laundry at the same time. I also have to make sure the boys’ homework is completed and showers are taken (They are boys). Then I have to make sure everything is in the backpacks, clothes are laid out for the next day and my 16 year old’s bag is packed for weight class. Then I start the nightly drama of going to bed. I have to find a snack and take another handful of pills. My legs hurt a lot, and I have to get my pain level down enough to go to sleep. What I have described is a GOOD day. If I have a bad day, I stay on the couch all day, and the only thing that gets done is supper (and the clothes laid out and backpacks packed). Nothing else gets done because the fatigue is too bad, and the pain is too high.
When you buy a bigRuby product, a portion of the proceeds will go to The Kindness Ranch (a sanctuary for research animals) as well as other animal rescues. bigRuby supports their heroic efforts in protecting those with no voice.
ONE VOTE PER DAY UNTIL APRIL 4 @ 11:59PM
I've not posted anything lately. It just means I've been having fun brewing and drinking the beer instead of writing about it. I did get to attend the National Homebrewer's Conference in Oakland. Many good beers, lots of things learned. I think the most worthwhile one for me was a session on cleaning and sanitizing. It's a subject that I needed to learn more about.
Two words about the weekend: the heat! My word, the heat! I don't like cold weather, but I have to admit I'm not a fan of living on the surface of the sun either.
6 T. dry powdered milk
Jerome Crouch
- In India United Mills No 1 (19.45 acres) in Parel there are 100 sewing machines.
Your project is under $20, 10 Points!
balance checkbooks who possibly know
"I will stop collecting catalogs (especially those I don't even want)."
I’ve been anticipating this show with all excitement since I’m a certified MINHO fan. I’ve been waiting for his next project and was very intrigued knowing his going to play a “gay” role. This is very interesting for him to play since it’s opposite of his character in Boys Over Flowers. But it turned out that his character really is not a “gay” and far to act like one. There are just certain circumstances in this series that was seasoned with malice and the “hidden agenda” tactic hence the plot of being pretend gay.
5And he that sat upon the throne said, Behold, I make all things new. And he said unto me, Write: for these words are true and faithful.
It's been far too long since I shared some new images
Had a flicker of distaste crossed his face? Rel certainly got angry enough when Pollack asked him to help with a First Realm case. It was easy to imagine Van Raighan, proud of his Gift, not much older than she was now, finding that his peaceful hometown had no use for him. Particularly with his being a Witness; not the most useful of Gifts.
I see the world as a million parallel universes (ie: each and every one of our lives) that are concurrent and happening simultaneously through our own lives. They are parallel because they are all accuring durring the same moment in the universe and on the same planet. I think about how my life is so completely different from the neighbor downstairs and the neighbors across the street and the people on the block and the people in the city. We are each our own little universe living at the same time on the same planet. We tend to cross more universes the closer you are to home or where you spend your time.
*** Optional***
For me, this film was as if I was witnessing a woman’s grand passion finally being awakened only to have it yanked away. We see how she channelled her passion for living into the empire that became Chanel. We never know what we are capable of accomplishing until we experience life and live all that is given to us, even in tragedy.
3) Put £1,000,000,000 into an account will an agreement that 20,000,000 will be released every year for the next 50 years. This should cover wages, expenses etc etc.
Easy peasy.
As you may have heard a lot about waste pickup changes in Hamilton here’s the straight dope:
So as you can see there is a science to growing good crops. it is not as easy as just planting seeds and getting food.
Many in legal practice have had clients come in after approaching the police about what they, the victims, have perceived to be criminal activity, only to be met with the response at the Police Station desk of “That will be a civil matter, Sir.”
grace me with your body if its not too much-
Just got in from my ride today, which was one of our most productive to date. It was very windy, the tarp canopies were flapping like mad, yet Val's mind stayed on me. I focused on breathing, from the minute I began grooming. Great warm up, smooth transition into contact, accurate school figures, supple, reaching horse. We had a few offers of the canter, but I schooled the halt / trot transition until we both got it right.
Green damask with pink taffeta. I'm not sure where this image has come from (please let me know if you do), but isn't it sublime? The lipstick-pink drapes, the wallpaper, the fashion illustration, the modern glass desk and the pink bouquet all combine to create a fresh, feminine and thoroughly sophisticated space.
And that's what the Manchester-based FlashTag writing collective (which consists of Manchester Blog Awards winners and flash fiction writers Benjamin Judge, David Hartley, Fat Roland and Tom Mason - oh, and me) were thinking about when we came up with our idea for a National Flash-Fiction Day event. We're fans of site-specific stories and of delivering our prose in unusual ways, so we've decided to treat the rainy city to some guerrilla story-telling; some flash fiction flashmobbing, if you will. We plan to travel across town, stopping off at various locations - from cultural venues to iconic spaces - where one of the group will read out a piece of short fiction to the public then move on. We're not releasing details of the itinerary until the day, when you can follow our progress - and perhaps catch us in action - via our Twitter account, @flashtagmcr.
Found this on the Kos this morning,…
A quick intro to sailing – you manipulate the wind by turning so that the sail will swivel to the other side of the boat. So you are turning, holding the sail, and ducking and moving to sit on the other side of the boat pretty much all in one effort. For starters, Amy held the sail and I steered.
Mike turned on the hot water and stood picking remnant sleep from his left eye as the water heated. He always had an enormous amount of sleep on his lashes that seemed to multiply in the first 20 minutes of being awake. Today was no different and frustrated he grabbed the wash cloth again and rubbed hard at his eyes before looking back at the wispy lashes that used to be full and beautiful. After years of this ritual the lashes could no longer manage to grow at the pace in which Mike destroyed them with violent wipes across his brow each day and the incessant picking that accompanied his hours in the desk chair.
The metro is not the safest, nor the most refined place in Paris, but I wasn't prepared for this week's happenings. (I recently read about the poor girl who was killed by a pick-pocket, pushed on to the tracks. What a tragic story that still gives me the willies.)
I've had that picture of my brother and I on my fridge for some time now and I've been wanting to make something sweet and delicious using Coke, when the people at Coca-Cola contacted me and asked if I'd like to make a recipe using the beverage. It just seemed like perfect timing and I couldn't wait to get started. I had so much fun with these cupcakes and photographing all the shiny red accompaniments- from the can to the cherries that topped the mounds of whipped cream on top of the cupcakes. Fun, I tell you!
Treu described the performances of Cornal Hendricks and Pieter Engelbrecht as two of the most pleasing aspects of Hong Kong. He hopes they will be able to maintain that level of consistency.
Rather like chronic Depression – those who have never dealt with it assume it is cured in the same way as ordinary depression – going for a brisk walk, helping someone in a worse of position than yourself, or having a laugh with friends. But the problem with Depression, the illness, is these things don’t cure it. They might alleviate the symptoms for a few minutes, or hours, but then it comes back. It is relentless.
* Doctoral degree (Ph.D., Dr.PH, MD, Sc.D) in epidemiology, health services research, economics or related field or equivalent training & mastery
Sometimes I question the wisdom (and sanity) of being the infamous Inspector Gadget.
5. The conclusion of the book – this part is unique to this book. I liked the way the author has concluded the book with the definition of Jaya and Vijaya.
Lipase – Enzyme from the stomachs and tongue glands of calves, kids, and lambs. Used in cheese-making and in digestive aids. Alternatives: vegetable enzymes, castor beans.
As someone once said, "writing is re-writing". I have always found this to be absolutely true. I have always found that "drawing is re-drawing" as well.
Hi Folks! Got this the other day and had to pass it along. I agree with the writer: yoga and such can be good for kids. But there are time-honored alternatives, too. – L.
So that is what my mother and I made for last Easter. Last Easter I wasn't a vegetarian, so I decided not to post pictures of the main meal, but I look forward to this Easter and can't wait to show you the photos of all the delicious food we eat.
Not so long ago, image editing and manipulation was something only done by those with apparent Photoshop mastery, but with so many apps allowing various effects to be applied in a one-click fashion, even the Average Joe can cut corners and put together some rather nice designs.
And, boy oh boy, have I found something I love. Neve Designs is a company based out of Colorado – which by the way seems to the be on the hippest eco-states right behind Washington (of course!). Neve Designs makes fantastically gorgeous clothing from 100% ultra fine merino wool. The patterns take a fun and funky turn on classic Nordic styles and gives them an extra punch with bold, bright colors and intricate details. I love that the patterns are eye-poppers that give your outfit the boldness so many of us shy away from. The 100% ultra fine merino wool is unbelievably luxurious. It has an awesome weight to it that fits your body’s curves just right, offers incredible warmth without any bulk and is sweetly soft to the skin.
And open arms.
Amnesty International released a statement condemning “widespread abuses” by armed Libyan militias enjoying blanket impunity.
By celestial aspiration
In 2006 my book America’s War On Sex: The Attack on Law, Lust, & Liberty was published. With a foreword by ACLU President Nadine Strossen, it documented how the Bush Administration, the Religious Right, Fox News, and “decency” groups were using the issue of sexual regulation to undermine secular democracy.
For all of the success of this year’s team, Port realizes that The Citadel will never become a perennial baseball power.
This could be age related, a result of your muscle mass and strength beginning to diminish. In some extreme instances, this can lead to a loss of the function al ability to lead a normal life. Later on in life, your body composition begins to shift from lean muscle mass to less lean muscle mass. Generally the naturally occurring outcome is increased body fat. Your scales may still read the same as they did in high school but the tonus of your muscles is no longer ideal. You have replaced the muscle weight with fat.
People were created to live in healthy community. The early church had a huge emphasis on living life with one another. In fact, there are over 30 “one another” passages in the New Testament. We are to love one another, share with one another, confess to one another, serve one another, pray for one another, celebrate with one another, mourn with one another, and teach one another. We are committed to community, discipleship, and communal prayer, and of course… parties!
There is no better sponsor than Gauche Alchemy!
to stay in touch.
One of my favorite things to do when I’m in need of some peace and quiet is to go out into our woods. No music, no people, no traffic, no phones. Sometimes, my dogs and some of my cats will follow me. We have a cabin in the woods that is situated not far from a creek. I like to sit and listen to the creek. Most days it’s gentle sounding. The water tinkles over the rocks. After heavy rains, it roars and overflows its banks. Some days, the roar fits my mood.
What does this mean? A new Aryan ubermensch? Blacks will define the future of humankind and not — arguably — the Chinese? What about the poor, disloyal “coconut” blacks who are not “true to themselves”? In the hegemonic order of the “new human race” will the coconuts et al be among the “prawns”, referring to that movie District 9?
Any QUICK meals you make on the go with veggies? i'm gonna start making something like that tomorrow..... can't wait!
Not sure what the inside of my card will say yet-- could be a thinking of you, spring greetings or get well card. Guess I will wait to see what I need it for.
And my personal favourite:
Characterization is achieved by the author through the careful delivery of external (descriptions of how the character looks, walks, drinks their coffee) and internal information (how they act in any given situation, who they interact with, the decisions they make, the decisions they don’t make). Note that these do not break down the same as internal and external dialogue.
I called a time-out after midnight and went back to my tent, like a ninja. If ninjas sing loudly, high-five everyone they walk past and drunk-dial sleeping non-Daisyfied Boys. #NinjaFail
- leftover ham cut into small pieces
These are their tactics of gaining support through lying and making members of their community believe them through the propaganda they so actively spread. This is starting to sound more and more like a certain violent doctrine I know of. It’s very easy for us to gather our members in each division around the country and attack members of any community. We are part of a grass-roots movement so large and strong, anything is within our capabilities. There is nothing out there that can match our strength. But we chose not to go down this route. The police are not at our demonstrations to protect us. They are there to make sure no harm comes to our counter protesters. But one promise I can make is that if any of our members are attacked like this again, we will act.
What, you may ask, is the point of talking about love languages and Volunteer Appreciation Week all in the same blog? Well, I think that they go hand in hand, and teach us a very important lesson. While Volunteer Appreciation week is one week out of our very busy volunteer year, it is just one week. How are we to make every volunteer know how much they are appreciated in one week? Is it possible?
2 cups of Salad or Vegetables at both Lunch and Dinner.
I might have been the only person in America to be excited to pull a card of Joe Beckwith in 1981. After seeing him listed as an upcoming prospect in Dodger yearbooks (no Bowman in those days, folks), I waited for Beckwith to achieve superstar status upon the hill.
I didn't dare ask if she planned on going back. She probably was. Let's face it, it was only one argument, despite being an ugly one. She probably couldn't have given me an answer at that point anyway, even if I had asked.
I often talk about how my country is in deep shit or how bad is our administration….and so on…..so basically, not really INTERESTING stuff !
Time for one more – and it’s over to Latvia, where there were a few good contenders to represent the country. Whilst I think Anmary’s Beautiful Song, that will be in Baku, was probably the perfect choice, it would be remiss not to include this final song in this memorial to songs that you might never hear again. Music Thief is a silly, funny song about plagiarism, with lyrics stolen from other songs and with musical elements you’ll recognise from elsewhere too. The lead singer’s voice gives you hope that one day you too could have a recording career. I’d like the Mad Show Boys come back next year with something equally daft.
First, proper drainage is very important because your plants’ roots need to have enough oxygen to breathe. Many people put gravel in the bottom of their pots to try to create drainage, but this is actually not the correct route to go, and does the opposite of what you would think. Water likes to reside in small pores, while gravel has very large pores, and so most of it will stay put in the soil. No gravel!
They sat for another couple of minutes in utter silence until Claire decided to break that silence “What do you love about me?” She asked with pure curiosity. “Excuse me?” Daniel replied. She asked her question again with much emphasis on the word “love”. Daniel then cleared his throat and said, “to be perfectly honest, I haven’t the slightest or faintest idea.” She looked at him curiously, and asked, “Then how come you’re sure you love me?” He let out a frustrated breath and carried on, “Oh witty Claire, it’s nothing that can be easily explained, like most of the philosophical bullshit you seem to think holly. I loved you ever since the first time I saw you. The first time we went out to see a horrible chick flick together. The first time we set out to explore the world together. So… I don’t know why I love you, but I love you. And I’m pretty sure you’re the person I’d rather spend my life with, even though you’ll drive me insane with all your philosophical means of life, but I’ve lived with them for the past five years, I can live with them for eternity” He laughed again but she sat expressionless, not sure what to make with words he just said to her. She felt like she was being pranked, like he’d always do when he’s trying to lighten the mood, but deep down her soul, she knew this was no joke and this was reality screaming at her. “Do you wanna talk about it?” She replied again by saying, “What’s there to talk about?”
That luncheon led a strong partnership with the association, with Mr. Rupp focused on creating interactive learning opportunities for students in the Seminole Middle law program.
- 1 double dot chipboard alpha pack
”Moses took the body of Joseph with him, as Joseph had made the Israelites solemnly promise to do. Joseph had said,
Were there other cardinals supporting
Bluebelle was so pleased with how everything made her feel like a little bride for Christ. John and I gave her one of Ruth’s First Holy Communion bracelets.
That’s not the case on just about any other piece of aerobic equipment. I can do a bit of work on the treadmill, but it’s purely walking, for a short period of time, until my leg fatigues or fills with so much sweat that my gait’s ruined. And it’s not good to walk on a soggy leg. Just like a shoe that doesn’t fit right, a leg that doesn’t fit right can cause a nightmare of rashes and blisters.
“We have to constantly develop more tourist-friendly products and services to meet the needs and preferences of tourists and must continue to promote Malaysia through our warm Malaysian Hospitality,” she said.
We've all seen this color before, but somehow every time I see it, it never gets old. Great formula, it was opaque in 2 coats, but I did a 3rd to build the intensity of the green flash. Love this color, and I love how it looks indoors and outdoors.
What could you do better for your children and your children’s children than to record the story of your life, your triumphs over adversity, your recovery after a fall, your progress when all seemed black, your rejoicing when you had finally achieved?
But, as their lives ended a great new beginning sprang forth. Because of their choice to cross the line, the Republic of Texas was born from their sacrifice.
The Prophet of Zek
I talked to our tea buyer two days ago and he was satisfied with this season's high mountain oolong. He said some farmers chose to oxidize this season's tea a bit more so the tea has a good, solid tea broth. He also mentioned this winter's tea can stand up to brewing much more than this past spring's tea (leaves were very tender due to a colder spring). He is especially excited with the winter DaYuLing and I can't wait to taste the tea with all of you! Our tea buyer was also able to find a good Buddha Hand as well. This Buddha Hand was literally sold out when he found it, but with a little begging, we were able to get some. All of the new high mountain oolongs are scheduled to arrive in about two weeks. Please check out our website for updates: www.floatingleavestea.com
Today, after a hearty Easter breakfast of boiled eggs, soldiers, baked yoghurt, hot-crossed bus and coffee (you really have to be properly fuelled you know), I invited Sarah to join me and we made our way in the drizzle to the coastal run. Another 11K in total – but I was glad to have Sarah with me as an excuse to go slower and stop occasionally after my beer, wine and bbq Saturday. The chin-ups were more successful than last week, but I’ve made myself a challenge today: to step up from my current 10 to a much more manly 20 before the real event.
Mace 1 blade
This covenant allowed Muslim extremists to plan attacks abroad and develop terror networks here. In 1999 it was reported that each year approximately 2,000 Muslims were trained about Holy War at camps in Britain run by Bakri’s organisation al-Muhajiroun.
“Why can’t you just give me directions?
I baked. French Vanilla Cupcakes with Buttercream frosting and Toasted Coconut.
1198 D-XI/6/1994. “The Reality of Appearances in Mozart’s The Magic Flute: A Return to the Garden of Eden?” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Alpine Valley Resort, East Troy, Wisconsin.
Nazri said that if the court cases were to proceed, it could not be settled in two or three years.
Advertisers on Facebook can single out profiles of married men who love cats, but what they can’t target is Hispanics. Or blacks. Or Asians.
I don’t recall if I decided this after watching Harriet the Spy for the sixteenth time or after the one time that I heard a scream in my neighbor’s house and then a collective “Shhhhh!”, but surely enough—I decided that my neighborhood was far too interesting to simply go home on a regular day and lock myself inside all day until I had to leave the next day. So, at around six-thirty or seven last night, right when the sun set and it was starting to get dark outside, I sat in my backyard to listen in on my neighbors, as they always let their backyard sliding doors open. It got too dark outside, and there was no noise coming from their homes except loud TVs (#421 lets their kids watch Disney Channel), so I decided to sit on my front porch, and take my camera.
Mat Zain said that even if the minister’s family repaid the “entire amount of the loan”, it did not change the fact that allegations of alleged financial abuse had been made. He also said Nazri’s remarks contradicted what he had said in Parliament last year.
LUCKILY Irene changed course and none of that happened.
to the certainty that everything is lost.
She hasn't rolled over yet, but gets SO close! It will be any day now!
Other than that, I think I'll do things about the same! Marko and I have always had a very good rapport, and I'd like to develop the same with this baby, figuring out what his or her signals mean and responding right away. I also hope to take just as many pictures (if I can only get my camera fixed!) and dote on this one just as much. I know now what I didn't then -- that the tiny baby stage passes in about four seconds and I'd better soak it in while it lasts. (And if it's awful, that too will pass fast.)
Loving live... loving Bali... and loving myself right now.
Our unhappiness stemmed largely from two areas. First, it felt like the activities were tailored heavily towards producing ‘things’ for parental consumption. On a daily basis, we were swamped by a deluge of paintings, drawings, collages, paper cutouts, etc. The importance given to all of this ‘stuff’ by the teachers did not align well with our own attempts at living a relatively simple life.
Thumbtack is similar to other freelancer databases but primarily related to administrative and back-office work. Tell them what you need and within 24 hours you’ll have 3-5 bids and be saying “bye, bye” to busy work.
Hummingbird cake (a spice cake with pineapple and pecans)
dime was taken from the jar.
Materials to be put on file include: the administrative punishment resolution, the case file examination and approval form, the case investigation report, the review report, the reconsideration resolution, the records of hearings, the hearing reports, evidence material, property disposition documents as well as other relevant materials.
or who has been his counselor?’
Origami! Somehow my mind took me to how could I make a ball? after a little bit of research I began experimenting with kusudamas. These are a kind of paper decoration ball made up of flowers. 1 square of paper folds to make 1 petal, 5 petals make a flower, I’m unsure how many flowers make 1 Kusudama, but I tell you it felt like 100′s!
A working group is needed to clearly establish the strengths and weaknesses of design in Iceland. The group would, for instance, analyze the uniqueness of individual parts of the country, and of Iceland as a whole; work towards building a strong network, both home and abroad; encourage collaboration between designers and businesses; create a vision for the future of Icelandic design; and, finally, find it a place on the international market. The working group’s primary objective will be to put Iceland’s unique assets on the world map.
KISS CHASE
Just give it a try. That is what I told myself about using this Annie Sloan wax. I haven't been able to get the hang of it. So, what is a girl to do but pick up some small piece to practice on. I found four of these at Goodwill.
13. Back in Hell
20. Going to the movies.
1/3 cup fine granulated sugar
Google’s Galaxy Nexusis the latest addition to this year’s hot smartphone line-up, alongside the iPhone 4S and the Droid RAZR. Unveiled last night, the Galaxy Nexus, manufactured by Samsung, embodies Google’s idea of the perfect smartphone, together with the brand-new Android 4.0 Ice Cream Sandwich mobile OS.
In his texts to former News of the World editor, Rebekah Brooks, it is claimed he signed off with LOL until it was pointed out by a flunky that it meant Laugh Out Loud.
- walking into cupboard doors that won't close properly
Ah, it just adds text without noting who wrote what, so we'll have to identify ourselves.
It would have been useful had Ministers reminded voters of this pledge and given some vague hint of when the “later date” might arrive. Still, it remains Government policy, and the answer, therefore, to the question: “If we’re going to directly elect a mayor, how can we directly unelect a rubbish one?” is that, by the time the possibility arises, some recall mechanism should, as promised, be in place.
Everyone goes there.
Circle Background -
The U.N. scout’s eyes grew even wider as he took in Pitcher still covered in mud and swamp slime. Pitcher slapped the man lightly on the cheek to focus his attention. He then pointed at the muzzle of the man’s rifle and then to the man’s forehead with his thumb and forefinger in the shape of a pistol. Pitcher pulled his hand back slightly and let his thumb fall like the hammer of a revolver. The U.N. soldier got the picture.
1990: 1037.7 OG
This is what I am dealing with, people:
There is no need to book a place; just turn up on the evening of the screening. If you are coming as part of a large group please let Community Initiatives know in advance by calling 020 7401 5176.
At the beginning of living away you spend a lot of time comparing your new home with your old home. Moving to a first world country as I did, you marvel at how life is more comfortable, services more efficient, the future more predictable. You feel more acutely all the many inferiorities of your old life.
They could have for instance have stuck the tickets into an envelope and taken them via a guard and one of their "trains" to Gloucester..... by hand. Now there's novel. Direct human communication.......
Print Details:
In the Wolf’s Lair . . .
Breakfast Stout ‘09
After cranking AC till the heat wave is stopped
I have some fun stuff from my Copic coloring book and a nice tutorial from The Stamping Boutique's blog to share with you today. The first photo is of my Copic coloring book, I've posted it here before so you may have already seen it. I made this 8 X 8 book for myself as a tool to help me remember great color combination's, record new techniques I've learned and to slowly be able to throw away all those little slips of paper with great color combos I'd like to try!
The breastplate- The New Jerusalem
Fifteen of the most overused words. It was easy to come up with them, because I like hear them, like every Effing day, you know what I mean, Dude?
We learn that the other soldier was Sara’s fiancée and that Sara, a specialist in chemical weaponry, may be the one person who holds the key to his destruction.
The new design is more like those familiar systems: lead-carbon, (PbC or Pb-C) where the carbon becomes the negative plate. It appears that there are two main companies in this arena, Firefly Energy and Axion Power. This is new technology, not widely available, yet, but the story is old-fashioned "smart guy has a better idea, gets venture capital" stuff, the way it's supposed to be. No big DoE grants here (that I can tell, anyway). From a trade newspaper's comments
What was I trying to achieve? I have barely any room in the freezer for the bags of puree or any more teabread, since the freezer is so packed with emergency post-surgery meals. If I force my family to eat extra piles of teabread made with specially-bought honey, what money am I saving?
We set out the normal amount of chairs, then quickly realized we would need more. So, I went back for more…then I went back for more. Soon we had every chair we owned set out, plus a few of our old ones that we saved from before the flood.
2. It gives me a pick-me-up at midday.
Grandma had a brilliant day last Saturday. The day was filled with energy and new ideas. Alice, Grandma, and I browsed through a quilting magazine and Grandma picked out a quilt with a basket square on it. She would like to make one for each of the boys (Robbie, Charlie, and Henry) and thinks that muslin, blue, and green fabric would be best for it. It was fun to plan the quilt and think about the boys.
During apartheid, please note that the SANTA executives were seen to be extremely frugal with the governments' funding -- that many thousands of patients were cured annually, and that many doctors and nurses even VOLUNTEERED their services free of charge.
1 motionless
Like most of the shows from the first American leg of this tour (and the third American leg of 1974), this is a very loose, relaxed show, with plenty of quotes in Dupree's Paradise.
Once the initial panic subsides you begin to sink into the peace, here, a 25-minute plane ride from Hervey Bay. The maximum island population is 100 and it turns out that the lack of signal is a blessing. What would a mobile phone mean here anyway, in a tranquil paradise bursting with wildlife?
Here's a joke from the kids...
Jack Teagarden (trombone)
The official language of the state is Arabic.
Things heated up with street protests after Friday's sermons at th emosques to the point where one of th e4protesters was killed outside of Egypt's Ministry of Defense. Others were injured as supporters of the army clashed in street fights with the Islamists.
Rise early. Stay home after five
geometric modulation (circle sweeps, sawtooth sweeps using a HAARP type technology):
”To all my wonderful friends … I am fine but am not able to get internet and no phone …. I am fine though and would appreciate your prayers because like so many others I am homeless, jobless and penniless. But frett not : ) I am rich in Christ and will be in touch as things improve : )”
Spring is here and it is the time to clean the house. We will give few ideas how to do a quick, cheap and easy Spring cleaning of your home.
organic cosmetics that are less expensive and easily found,
I just finished your book about 5 minutes ago, Cracked, I breezed through it in about 2 days, even with school I could hardly put it down.
I can't remember when I have seen anything more inspirational. Those women taught me something about showing off and owning what you have.
While the privileged children's test scores may not have been impacted I question if they were being allowed to LEARN all they could are if they were being held back in order to appease Goldstein's and others sense of fairness. I know my children were not being academically challenged in their public school.
the only 2 weeks of fall,
On our first visit to Nashville, my wife accidentally left her purse on a chair in the airport while we went to another level to look for our baggage. When we returned to look for her purse, it was still sitting there, and nothing was missing. On another occasion, we went swimming in a Nashville-area lake, and my wallet somehow slipped out of my swimsuit. Before I even missed it, a woman I had never met gave it back to me. In Arizona, our car windows have been smashed twice.
I’ve loved you,
Pip and Polly are the proud inheritors of Ava’s childhood collection of 1980s Cabbage Patch dolls, and last week they decided to take each doll in for a visit to the doctor. They do these visits periodically, designating one of the tables in our living room as an exam table and pulling out various utensils from the kitchen to serve as a stethoscope, an x-ray machine, etc. Pip usually takes the lead in this process, handing out roles to Polly and me and telling us what we should say at various points throughout the examination.
Tasting notes: Of course raspberry from nose to close. Cloudy cranberry hue, great after dinner drink.
A small, unfocused blur, a standing chill
THE WEAKEST LINK (BBC2)
The ECJ accurately draws the perimeter of a set of rules and principles that, within the court's interpretation, prove to be coherent and uniform (implicitly addressing some of the doubts expressed by E. I. Obergfell, ‘No need for harmonizing film copyright in Europe?’ (2003) 4 The European Legal Forum 199–205). By recognizing the principal director as a statutory author, to whom copyright and related rights are originally attributed, while openly acknowledging the possibility of transferring exploitation rights to the producer, providing authors with a fair compensation, European Union law achieves a fine balance between the aims of protecting authorial rights and facilitating the production and exploitation of cinematographic works. The widespread adoption of similar measures, as well as the affirmation of the parties’ contractual autonomy, seems to question the traditional dichotomy between copyright and authors’ rights systems (see P. Kamina, Film Copyright in the European Union, Cambridge University Press 2002).
The ugly truth is it's the spineless parents who parade their undisciplined children around like royalty that make people dislike kids.I think the truth is even uglier: It's the parents who expect their children to behave perfectly all the time who raise people like Granderson, who apparently can't stand children. I think that deep down inside any adult who hates children must be a child who was raised to hate himself.
ISBN: 978-0-60936-193-8
it’s highly improved the speech quality of hand free car kit communication
Last night was a bad night. A really bad night. One of those nights where you wonder if anything you do is worth it. Where you just want to give up and delete your entire novel off of your computer.
I love them and also long for the other two that don't yet call me Mommy but are still mine. I go to bed every night praying for my 4 children, even if only two of them I held that day and sleep in the next room.
I have a theory about what makes books sell, and I want to do this experiment to see if I'm right. But I am a huge chicken (which is ironic, because I'm terrified of all feathered animals. Especially ducks and chickens).
The process for foreign applicants is simple. First, you verify the availability of the domain name. Then, by completing and submitting the online form, you will have a reservation order that will be finally processed if a payment is submitted within the next 30 days. The cost for a foreign application is $60 for a third level domain (the same cost goes for its IDNs) and $120 for a second level domain name (with the same costs for its IDNs).
Communication is important. If one thinks back to some of their earliest auctions, they can probably remember the fun and excitement of communicating back and forth with prospective buyers who had questions or concerns. Quite often, it was that interaction that made eBay attractive to us and that helped us close sales we might have otherwise lost. As one grows their online business, they need to remember the value of personal and prompt communication. Many eBook sellers, whose attentions are drawn to a thousand other considerations lose track of this important sales key. Answer questions and concerns quickly and promptly. More sales will result.
(Hiding Out In My Craft Room)
The floor in the corridor leading to the dining area has 17 gold stars — one for each sailor killed when terrorists bombed the Cole as it was refueling in Yemen’s port of Aden on Oct. 12, 2000.
…you must post the rules
The film stars Jonah Hill, Channing Tatum, Brie Larson, Dave Franco, Rob Riggle, DeRay Davis and Ice Cube – with Phil Lord and Chris Miller onboard as directors – what was it like working with the cast and crew on-set? Any good anecdotes?
But here's to October, the last awesome month we had before this storm hit. I like that it's still there as a reminder of good times. If I could go back to that month and live in it forever, I would. But now I look forward to NEXT October, when I can say that I survived an entire year in this storm, and beat it.
I liked too that comment that the only thing holding Fallici from embracing Catholicism was her being scandalized by “Catholic corruption.” Cut me a fricken break. And grant Fallici a degree of mental sophistication. She isn’t some blockhead scandalized by the sin of her fellow humans.
And since these little tools are cheap (I got this one from Wet 'n Wild for 69 cents), it is easy to replace them on a regular basis. Sharpeners like the one in my photos, I replace 3 times a year. My specialty ones, for much larger, blush pencils, I replace as I find that size.
Finalize decor!
Being a person also involves a few realizations about your community, such as how they really make decisions.
And what say you to this? Percy, Northumberland,
Long and Lovely: For those bridesmaids out there with long hair, try a style that takes advantage of your long locks and showcases them with style. This stunning curly hair style is perfect for a bridesmaid at an outdoor afternoon wedding or sunset ceremony on the beach event. Talk to your expert stylist on what products to use on your curly and wavy hair to bring out the curls and add in shine with no frizz! For those of you with long straight locks, consult with your stylist on getting your hair into tip top shape to ensure softness and shine and try a low slung side pony tail, loose braid or simply loose and flowing softly over your shoulders for a truly classic appeal that never fails.
Oh, well, she's a thumb sucker when she starts to get tired.
Stephanopoulos: Gingrich is trying to
Could I move my foot? Kinda.
So how was he heard by the one who was able to save him from death?
If, for example, we set f22 we'll have a considerable DoF. we'll have substantially a bigger portion of the sharp area in front and behind the focusing plane, such an opening is used generally for the landscape photography.
She’s not all bad, even though she tried to break up Jane and Bingley. She did warn Elizabeth about Wickham—it was Elizabeth who blew her off.
That night, at Jenkins house, it nears midnight when gunfire rips through a window. Jonah knocks Jenkins to the floor and peers out the window. He can tell that the gunfire is coming from a nearby hill. Jonah tells Jenkins to keep low as he runs out the back. Heading up the hill, Jonah thinks it odd that the Indian, whose past attacks have been very close & personal, would choose a rifle this time.
We need to teach our daughters (and sons) the realities of abortion (see this amazing series by Brooke McGlothlin), the difficulties of teen parenting, and the pain of giving up children for adoption. We need to continually stress to them, like Kaylee says, that the sure-fire way to prevent pregnancy is to not have premarital sex.
The resulting novel is very different from that first book but I’m glad I decided to go back to my roots. The book is finished now and published. Did I succeed in meeting the challenge? Only time and the reader can tell.
In 1975 I was seven years old and loved the Bazookas my mother bought for Walid and me at Spinney's in the Ramlet al-Baida neighbourhood.Ziadé uses bright watercolours infused with a Pop Art sensibility, perfect in the opening pages to highlight the obsessions of a young girl in thrall to 'the best of what the Western world can offer' in Spinney's supermarket. Trolleys, escalators, marshmallows and Kellog's cereals are all lovingly recreated in their garish glory but just as we might be falling for the lure of nostalgia an upended bottle of blood-red ketchup heralds the beginning of violence and the pages of consumer goods turn into several pages of munitions, each described with the same verve, as if the allure of these weapons provoked the same feeling in the various militias around Beirut as the sugary sweetness of processed food did to Ziadé.
Set a large bowl, and the beaters of a hand mixer into the fridge for 2 hrs. Now pour the cream into the chilled bowl and start whipping it. Add the vanilla extract and continue to wipe it.
In tapes released to ABC News’ “Primetime” in 2006, Yates said she drowned her children because she didn’t want them to go to hell. Yates’ defense team argued she was influenced by Michael Woroniecki, a preacher from Oregon.
Comes to me from above.
If you've been hanging with me for the few weeks I've been up and running, you know that I have a special affection for the ladies that make up the The Indelibles. Several have been kind enough to forward me their books for review and I've won a couple more in giveaways. So far, I've reviewed 3 books that are linked to 3 of the short stories listed above, on my blog - BOUND by C.K. Bryant, RUNNING WIDE OPEN by Lisa Nowak and BECOME by Ali Cross. Reading those 3 stories in this anthology was like visiting a friend. You already know the basics, and yet there's still something new and interesting to learn about them. Also, a male perspective for the whole read, that's a bonus. Throw a romantic theme on top of that and you've got the recipe for an extra special Valentines Day treat. . . and it's FREE! Who says no to that?? I'm gonna go with. . . . . crazy people.
Martin Narey, chief executive of Barnardo's, told the BBC that detaining children in Yarl's Wood was "very, very damaging", but "not because staff there are monsters or because it's run badly".
Karen created very unique characters that came to life off the page.
Squirt gave me one of his many bionicle tutorials, so that I'd get the build right!
*moved to a convertible car seat. I think you like it better.
The President was having an Oval Office meeting with top aides when he learned that the shuttle had blown up. He stood in “stunned silence” as he watched a televised replay of the disaster, said White House spokesman Larry Speakes.
Great deal for the price. And you get a set of hunting glasses for early morning or late evening that make the most of little light. You will probably still need a set of clear glasses also though. Some light situations make it hard to pick up pencil lines., I don’t use these as advertised. I bought them because I didn’t want to spend a lot of money on clear lenses to prote…
Bust: Still 39″
I thought it would be a wonderful way to connect with other people with similar passions especially as it is so visually stimulating and enjoyable as there is so much inspiration to be found. I also enjoy having my own online diary of my passions and journey that is my record to keep and enjoy forever.
It's further away than I'd expected, past the signs for the shopping centre, beyond a billboard boldly announcing the'ultimate karting experience'. As I turn in, the slip-road winds on and on until I'm almost convinced I've missed the car-park and I'll be spat back out onto the motorway, but then I see it, looming up out of the last remaining wisps of the early-morning mist.
Finally, I also urge DSNY to review its procedures with respect to ordering the proper amount and type of snow shovels. Many lessons were learned from the 2010 Blizzard, and I am confident that when snow storms hit again this winter the City will be much better prepared to handle it in every way.”
* Is it better to work on a person who is an unbelievably over-the-top racist or is it better to just cut and run? Is it hypocritical to continue a friendship with a racist if one calls oneself an anti-racist? I'm afraid it might be. But, I can always cut and run later if I can't influence the racism, right? /sigh/ I don't know.
The evil Obama and his sycophants in the media, the Democrat Socialist Party, the Left , and all those drones out there view The Constitution as something that must be overcome and destroyed. Once this is done then utopia on earth can be created. Except these folks forgot one little iddy biddy piece of information. This has been tried many times before and the results are hell on earth. Dictators rule supreme and “We The People become the serfs and slaves to the elites of society. And truly we are all in the screwed big time.
Sunday night they introduced the Three Annie's on Channel Nine News and it was great watching her on TV.
8 Shrimp a-shriveling
Twilight recognizes this; the Ursa is a tired and confused cub that’s been provoked. Her approach is as rooted in humility as it is powerful; she confronts the Ursa head-on, but soothes it back to its rightful place (in our parallel, we just concern ourselves that it is gone). Twilight’s power is indicative of the role of evangelism. We’re not waging a war against the unrighteous; we’re waging a war for God’s vision of this world. That’s a power that Trixie won’t ever comprehend, because all of her magic is aggressive, rather than capable of healing and soothing.
I truly never expected to grieve — he’d been sick so long and had suffered so much, that I was relieved when he died. In fact, I wished that he would. I’ve had a hard time these past months remembering that his death was actually a good thing — all I could think was that he should never have suffered in the first place. And he shouldn’t have. No one should have to deal with such pain for so many years. He stayed away from drugs as long as he could, suffering unbearably, because he knew the truth: the same drugs that would relieve his pain would addle his mind and disorient him. He wanted to be himself as long as he could (though he already was drifting from himself — the cancer had invaded his brain, and the poor man could barely hold two thoughts in his head.)
When I’m not playing the eccentric dog-owner, I’m reading and working on my novel. Here’s what I’m reading now:
Where an invention concerns a specific polynucleotide or polypeptide sequence then it is normally desirable to also cover variants. This is usually done by drafting claims that cover homologues of the sequences defined using percentage identity or homology. In such cases the description of the application should refer to an algorithm that can be used to calculate the identity/homology.
Then I saw it.
Take note all who are involved in this massive theft of national assets: not only will you go to jail for your actions but those assets will be recovered by the state and returned to their lawful owners.
The greatest is LOVE and for HIS love several men named Valentine were martyred. Valentines day is a day we celebrate not because of Romeo and Juliet but because of the men named Valentine who actually died for the greatest love there is... the sweet and amazing love of Jesus!
I think when I feel a prompting to send a card from now on I will. I hope you will too! One of the blogs I follow ends each time with "send someone some love in a card today". I think she has the right idea! :0)
I'm feeling the need to make a lace shawl coming on.....
Paloma Efron– Paloma Custom Cakes - Cake decorating goddess. And damn fine baker, too.
Last night’s TV news shows reported that today the police would arrest former News of the World editor Andy Coulson. Now where would they have got that story from? Only the police would know. And today he was arrested.
they know me and all my faults and insecurities and loved me through my freshman 15, applying to medical school--twice, breakups, moves, losses, loves...
in this morning's sunlight
The Ak-Chin Community and the nearby city of Maricopa have had a “good neighbor policy” for decades in spite of occasional misunderstandings. They have worked together on issues and projects that benefit areas.
The second hour, I was lured to a panel on "Breaking the Rules" because Dr. Doug Lyle is always good for a laugh. The topics touched upon characters who do things their own way, and what the author can do to make them credible. Those in licensed professions have rules and standards they must follow. Dr. Lyle mentioned that he wanted his character outside of the medical profession, so he never finished medical school. This freed him from having to follow the rules.
Malaysia is a multiracial society with quite different racial groups, each with its own interests, but through an honest racial dialogue they have managed to create a society where the cleverness of the Chinese can be partially balanced by affirmative action that benefits the indigenous Malays and allows the two groups to create a reasonably effective symbiosis.
"Why it is that 'man's inhumanity to man' should often produce great art is one of the mysteries of the human spirit."
Rooney's birthday was on Saturday (December 17th), he would have been 11. It's still hard around here without him. Everyone misses him. I forget sometimes, when I hear Miller or Bella coming into our great room, I will turn around thinking its Rooney, for a split second, and then realize its Miller or Bella. I wanted to go put a nice throwing stick (his favorite) on his grave for his birthday, but I couldn't. I kinda felt like I may crumble to the ground out there if I did...but, I will, in a day or two. I have had such beautiful support from people caring so much about us losing Rooney, it really means a lot and fills my heart.
Armies of the Carthaginian Wars 265-146BC
1) Have independence. This means freedom from shareholders. One of the single dumbest ideas was to collect agencies in these big holding companies and go public. A creative company needs an environment that allows that it to sink or swim based on taking some chances with ideas, otherwise there will never be "big ideas' or because no one will be willing to allow the potential risk. Nothing sucks the life out of creativity like Wall Street.
Recent horrifying events in the United States have underscored the fact that we live in a world of uncertainty. Never has there been a greater need for righteous mothers—mothers who bless their children with a sense of safety, security, and confidence about the future, mothers who teach their children where to find peace and truth and that the power of Jesus Christ is always stronger than the power of the adversary. Every time we build the faith or reinforce the nobility of a young woman or man, every time we love or lead anyone even one small step along the path, we are true to our endowment and calling as mothers and in the process we build the kingdom of God. No woman who understands the gospel would ever think that any other work is more important or would ever say, “I am just a mother,” for mothers heal the souls of men. Sheri L. Dew (“Are we not all mothers” Oct. 2001)
Cinematography: Reginald H. Wyer (and Reg Johnson)
The Cuban government is urging U.S. officials to sit down and talk
The ancient Greeks were the first to lay a foundation for a comprehensive medical tourism network. In honor of their God of Medicine, Asclepius, the Greeks erected the Asclepia Temples, which became the world’s first health centers. People from all over traveled to these temples to seek cures for their ailments. From the aristocratic patrons of Bath to the pilgrims of Japanese onsen (hot springs), history is full of travelers who went on therapeutic trips in order to improve their health.
What a wonderful day to travel by balloon - I am most envious.....until I spot that the pilot above is not in a basket - he or she seems to be suspended in some sort of harness. Oooo er! I'm not that brave.
The stock is now at yet another all time high. After rallying $9.65, or 1.8%, to $535.41 in the regular session – closing at the high for the day and giving the company a market cap of $499.2 billion – the stock has inched up another 96 cents after hours to $536.37. That’s just enough to push the stock’s market cap to the north side of a half trillion bucks.
I've been doing some things that I never found the time to do before. First of all, I want to inform you all that you can now become a fan of my blog on Facebook and get updates when I post! I also have a Twitter account now. (A bit of shameless self-promotion there...) And...I'm working on an About page! I'm having a hard time writing something about myself and that's why I don't have one yet.
I claimed one of the two tables, enjoying stellar presentation and flatware to match—not unlike going to Lady M on the Upper East Side.
Personally, I reccommend the carnitas burrito with pinto beans. It is amazing. My mouth is watering just thinking about it. Pairing that with an Arizona Iced tea or Bundaberg ginger beer and I am one satisfied customer. As an added bonus, Boojum is located just five minutes away from one of Dublin’s best shopping areas (Jervis centre and Henry street) and 6 minutes away from Cineworld cinema.
With a smaller cup.
with tropical nectar, decay and salt.
Which brings me to this astounding rendition of Foggy Mountain Breakdown. The cast of players is legend. The playing is moving.
I hadn't gotten the opportunity to see the rebuilding process, and was anxious to check out how it was coming along and how everything had changed.
--colored tights. If there's anything besides bright lipstick that can make my day happy, it's colored tights.
7. Settling on the status quo doesn’t necessarily help you progress… challenge it
WASHINGTON, D.C. — Even if President Barack Obama approved the controversial Keystone XL pipeline tomorrow, at least some Canadian oil would still flow to Asia, according to Prime Minister Stephen Harper.
Keller. I have a natural affinity for writing that name. When I first glanced the name on the pages of the book, I had a violent and to the people surrounding me, an extremely random laughing fit. It is because it is the surname of one of my favouirte characters from the comic book meduim, you see. And said favouirte character is both handless and a guy. But Keller, you see is a girl, and reminds me off the aforemnetioned favouirte characters possibly love intersest. (By possible I mean they have been dropping hints for the past SIX years. This girl, coincidently, is also a favouirte character.) Anyway, this was not the only reason why I liked Keller - she was a strong character, with a lot of back bone. Though she lacked the sense of humour, I am not suprised and shall take the effort of writing a fanfic to improve this situation.
In our case, we boarded a sea plane and flew 30 minutes to the Lux Resort on the island Dhidhoofinolhu in the South Ari Atoll. We worked closely with a travel agent and did a lot of research on-line before making our choice of lodging.
last week, najah wrote up a nicely analyzed view of how she'll balance sewing and life in the future (woefully forgetting a section for cocktails. bad, bad najah!). though i realize her weekly sew-flow chart may rob us of wonders from her talented hands (i mean seriously), i get it. weekly challenges can kick your ass and take over your LIFE. ask ruggy, oona does it! pretty much did me most of the time. it made me think about how i sew now versus then (because really, it's all about me. you know this, yes? good). back Then, it would take me a week to sew and document a single project. but now i haz super skills. now all i need is twelve hours.
koh gen do is not a new brand. the Japanese brand was founded by actress Ai Saotome. at first skincare was the main focus in mind but koh gen do gained quite a following causing expansion to makeup. the brand is quite popular with movie/tv set makeup since it focuses on HD makeup. it seems koh gen do has recently been introduced to the US as it started opening counters within the past few years.
“The tornado and thunder happening around 12:46 pm (0346 GMT) are believed to be the cause of the outage for 19,300 clients in Tsukuba and its surrounding areas,” she said.
And I just learned off of Twitter that the woman in the NAACP video has resigned, so now it can be swept under the rug and never brought up again. Unless your racist that is.
Article 18 An artwork located or on display in an outdoor public place provided in Item 10 of Article 22 of the Copyright Law means such artworks as sculptures, paintings, handwritings and others set up or exhibited in an outdoor public gathering place.
And I'll be back in 2012 to show the pics of the incredible adventure of the beams - Olivier and 2 friends has been working on it this week and as I have to do the B&B, could not do a real photo reportage, but have something to show you soon!
How a number-crunching tweet machine became Calgary’s mayor, and why his down-home leadership is transforming municipal politics. By Marcello Di Cintio From: Reader’s Digest Canada, May 2012
I'm delighted to have this brewery on board, there's something about their refreshingly unpretentious 'family run' ethos that I'm keen to know more about.
The thing that is very clear in my memory is the who’s who of those that gathered that night. Many acid newbies as well as the generation that had been with me through 1990, 1991 and 1992. When you take acid you need people you could rely on the support whatever trip you happened to be on and I believe I was seen as that person by many of my peers.
So that must mean something, right?
My cousin Elizabeth asked me to paint a picture of her boyfriend’s beloved companion, Jake. Jake died unexpectedly this past year, so this is a pretty important request.
So last night, when GDA sweetly presented me with this beautiful box of Russell Stover... all I kept thinking was... I have to tell him! I can't spend the next (insert amount of time here... I'm afraid to speculate) getting huge boxes of chocolates...
I saw in the window a picture of the Trick or Treat Coupon Booklets for $1.
Zippie! ”the sneaking feeling one has that others are conspiring behind your back to help you.”
Indians choosing to stay home leaves the arena to the two major races, Malay and Chinese.
Christians around the world these days are reading about injustice — the story of a whole series of towering legal offenses committed against our Lord which led to his brutal death on a Roman cross.
After what feels like an eternity, I located the clasp and after about three tries was able to set myself free. I left the bracelet dangling on my undies and proceeded with the routine of zipping up and washing up. Unfortunately, the inquisitive looks from the audience waiting outside the stall were ones I was all-too familiar with; something that just seems to go along with being Emma.
In addition to fresh produce, they also have local eggs, meat, pasta, bread, herbs and crafts. If what you are looking for is fresh and local, chances are you can find it at the market. Opening day for this year's market is this Satuday and J and I plan on being there right when it opens!
For those unfamiliar with the Sierra Nevada story: it all began in Woodland Hills where the Grossmans would stop by a local homebrewer's kegerator for free beers. When Cal got wise to them he took it upon himself to teach them to brew their own so he could drink more of his own. Ken later moved to Chico and opened a homebrew shop. In 1980 they started the brewery with the equipment Ken had pieced together. The original kettle was 10 BBL and later expanded to 17 BBL. This was used for the first 9 years until Mad River purchased it (where it is still in use).
I knew little of where I was heading
I saw the answer when my inmate guide escorted me to the notorious punishment cell once used for torture. Today, he told me, this block houses only a single inmate. As we reached the end of the long concrete corridor and he put the key in the lock, he paused and asked, “are you sure that you want to go in?”
The fourth law of karma is this: Karma expands. Karma is organic, it is related to the nature of life. As in our prayer today, one way in which Karma expands is that actions lead to the formation of habits. So within one’s own life, each action sets a precedent for future action:
Tash negotiated a price of $5.00 (she's gooood!)
Fri 11pm: How depressing. Rosa Bonheur is already passé. And nobody is at La Trinquette or Andy Wahloo. Where are we going to hang out all summer? What is up with Paris??
On October 15, 2009 CNN reported that home foreclosures hit an all- time record high in the third quarter of this year. One in every 136 US homes is either in default, auction notice or bank repossession. In 1949, a New York State apple farmer named Les Rice wrote a song called Banks of Marble that detailed the plight of the working man, and their struggles against the Banks. Les was a neighbor of folk singer Pete Seeger, and a one-time president of the Ulster County Farmers Union. Pete’s group The Weavers recorded the song in 1950, and it has been a popular union song ever since, particularly in Ireland. American singer / songwriter Iris Dement has also performed the tune live on her recent tours.
This morning Bug and I make soup and bread. Cody awakes and steps over our small toddler table. Our table surrounded by a lovely bean (from the soup) and flour (from the bread) explosion.
Purple.
Aria and Yamaha are two manufacturers that make high-quality kids guitars. Any kid that’s interested in learning how to guitar will find either of these brands to be a good choice. They are tunable, stay tuned, and produce a real guitar sound; making the entire experience more enjoyable for the younger student. This is far better than a cheap toy.
The airplane arrived in…Okinawa! And thus they started their journey in accordance with the topics that were decided at CharaHobby 2011: “On a southern island”, “HiroC will become slippery”, “there will be a chaotic attack”, and “HiroC and OnoD will be happy in the end.”
RC cars very funny to play and with the most recent trends through simply having a rc vehicle which appears like just a little plaything, this additional presented radio controlled that are wifi, have stronger engines and is controlled from the eq.
I'm not a big party person, I'm too cheap. :) My parties here and here are fairly low-key and pretty simple and easy. Now these two fabulous parties here and here are my sister, Leslie's, awesome creations. See, she loves to plan a party, me, not so much. So back to Cheyenne, 16 is one of those big years and we told her she could have a party. She wasn't sure she wanted to, which friends should she invite, it costs too much, it's too much work for you, mom, and on and on. I told her 16 is a time to celebrate so quit your whining we're having a party! ;) Let me tell you though, a 16 year old party is so much easier to plan than a 6 year old party. I decorated our bonus room a little, bought a bunch of pizza, and left them to have fun watching movies, playing xbox, ping-pong and pool. They all had a great time, I think, and there was only one small casualty of a broken pool cue (thank goodness it was just the little one.)
Unwind that tape of love
Today's Question: "What will your soul searching and repentance lead you to change?"
I spoke to friend and YMCA trainer, Paula, and she told me about the "BMR (Basal Metabolic Rate) Calculator." Your BMR takes several things into account such as your age, weight, height, gender... AND your exercise level. You will NEVER believe what it said... I should be eating a MINIMUM of 2,870 calories A DAY to keep my system from shutting down!
What ends?
Question Your Teaspoons by Alec Finlay (pamphlet)
A man as fake in all he says and does as the mock Tudor beams he charged the taxpayer to have fitted to his constituency home, he will fit in so so well in the Lords.
From each of those closest Ancestors run two light lines to their parents (one of whom from each side is sitting in the close-Ancestor-cluster I work with daily), and from each of those, two further parental lines.
I’m about a fifth of the way through my NaNoWriMo needs. Given that it’s only day 5, I’m both doing well and bad.
We used a green bias tape to use as a string to hang the flags from. I always grab these when I see them when I’m thrift stores. We seem to find many ways to use them in our crafting.
Bumper Beepers & , Body Worn Transmitters
- Friends
Ognissanti means “All Saints”, and it’s yet another church that is also filled with art and other great things. Besides being the church that Amerigo attended (the navigator that my country/continent is named after) and frescoes covering the walls, it’s also the place where I plan to pay my respects to my favorite Renaissance painter: Sandro Botticelli!
However, when we tried to search the location with our car, we couldn't hear the music any longer. We just drove around the campus and this college is huge! It felt like a whole mountain was the campus of this college. It is very green and beautiful college.
(??) It seemed to me he was a bit parsimonious with his "love."
I'm Much Too Tired to Play Tonight
Here is a little bit of information about Brooke the golfer, whom loves to drive it off the tee. Before playing, she always puts on sunscreen and stretches. During the round she drinks plenty of water and has a healthy snack, like an apple. When she’s not on the golf course, Brooke enjoys volunteering at the local animal shelter and hiking.
1176 *D-XI/16/1993. “Robert’s Rules of Order and the Conduct of Deliberative Assemblies in the United States.” Faculty Workshop, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1996(6), above.)
So I have taken to lobbying Enfield Borough Council to get wheelie bins, the same wheelie bins that many parts of Britain complain so fervently about but where we are, whether its wild creatures or foraging gypos, we need them to protect our precious rubbish.
Ananias was the messenger of these tidings.
Somebody told me no one knows you better than yourself
“Then there was old Binky Rogers, who managed to shoot himself in the head from 300 yards away.
The crew arrived within a few minutes and, as I watched in my rear-view mirror, she walked out with them, supported by a staff member. As I referred back to my paperwork, a strange and almost surreal thing caught my eye. I saw a man pushing an antique car up the hill towards Piccadilly. I think the vehicle was person-powered because the running man seemed to be comfortable doing what he was doing – pushing a car with someone sitting in it. I suddenly felt the urge to shout out ‘What’s the point? Why don’t you both just jog?’ But I didn’t.
Or, conversely, maybe you're just doing what every other person on the planet does... which is looking at your own life and trying to fit it into some great, big cosmic pattern, because no one can stand the thought that they aren't right at the center of everything important. Which is why countless apocalyptic writers - like me, for instance - always seem to say the antichrist has just appeared. Or is just about to appear. Antiochus, Frederick II, Peter the Great, and a pile of other people have been named and accused and everyone held their breath, and whoever the boogeyman was just made his way through life, then croaked, and somehow the world didn't end.
That story began with a battalion surrounded by the enemy in one of Vietnam’s fiercest battles. The survivors remember the desperate fear of almost certain death. They remember gunfire that one witness described as the most intense he had ever seen, and they remember the sight of an unarmed helicopter coming to their aid. The man with the controls flew through the gunfire not once, not 10 times, but at least 21 times. That single helicopter brought the water, ammunition and supplies that saved many lives on the ground, and the same pilot flew more than 70 wounded soldiers to safety.
I can't believe that I used to call it, "home"—
Xu Guan shrugged his shoulders. He’d fired plenty of rusty rifles in his relatively brief military career. The long barrels were unwieldy in Xu Guan’s opinion, however. The gun had originally been designed to hunt waterfowl. The 34” barrels were fully choked – perfect, if you wanted to bring down a goose at 40 yards. Xu Guan figured he would likely be at closer quarters if he needed to use the gun. He looked around the shed and spotted a hacksaw hanging from a nail. It was just as rusty as the shotgun. The blade appeared to be worn nearly smooth. Xu Guan began looking through the drawers of the shop bench and then the large tool box sitting on the bench near the door. In the third drawer down in the toolbox, he found what he was looking for – a dozen unused hacksaw blades. Xu Guan tossed the blades on the bench near the saw.
Several die cuts; red&white dots organza ribbon, twine; stripes buttons and pearls; lace in the front panel.
When we find the original and true Fulford (if he is still alive), it is certain he will have quite a story to tell, and verify the narrative released here.
These are very high quality articles
Carpe diem,
Jerry Brown, a card-carrying nerd, was tall and extremely thin. With a teenage face that could stop a train, Jerry was in no way a ladies man. His thick rimmed glasses and serious acne fought with his severely crooked teeth and his lethal nose for attention. Since childhood, Jerry’s only desire was to serve his beloved community and gain the respect of those he grew up with. Even on the school playground, Jerry’s ability to be the only oddball automatically gave him the right to be the only “good guy” when playing cops and robbers. However, being rejected by his peers only made Jerry stronger.
On the basis of modern scientific research, only a small portion of the mysteries of material nature have been unraveled. Hence in comparison to what yet remains to be discovered whatever has been unraveled is very infinitesimal. Today the discovery of atomic energy is said to be a great scientific achievement and yet great scientists of the world opine that the more science dives deep into the subtle nature of the world even greater amazing mysteries can unfold. In comparison to a pile of dust the miracle of atomic energy is supreme. In the same way in comparison to atomic energy, the power inherent in the nucleus of an atom is that much more manifold. If the atom is the solar system its nucleus is the blazing sun at its centre. All the planets of the solar system depend on the sun for light and energy. Lest the sun gets destroyed the entire solar system will collapse. One will never know where and how it petered away to naught. A scientific intellect will indeed be wonder struck to note how powerful the nucleus of the atom is and its method of directing atomic movements. There is a great possibility of an even more powerful energy existing in the cave of the atomic nucleus and that even deeper than that an even more intense power is present. Today topics like ‘anti-universe’ and ‘anti-atom’ are being discussed animatedly all over the world. It is believed that bang opposite to our world lies another magical world which is very close to it. This unknown world is becoming so powerful which can be compared to the soul force of ones body. Just in case one unfolds the mystery of the anti-universe and anti-atom and gains mastery over it only then can man (who claims to be supreme amongst all living beings of the world) truly proclaim that he is the master of the world.
Boyfriend told me I need to stop watching the show, that I’m letting horror stories hold me back from living, but even without watching the show, I wouldn’t want to cliff jump. I don’t want to sky dive, and I don’t want to bungee jump. I’m completely happy riding roller coasters for my adrenaline rush thank you very much. I don’t feel like it’s holding me back because if I want to do something, I do it.
Nowhere Girl
then on a bit of a tangent there's slot of conversations I've found myself in lately with people expressing the end of days coming in 2012 (which I'm not a believer in) and the frequency of these conversations, not the actual topic, but that so many people are subscribing.... leaves me a little speechless.
Challenge 11: May 20
In a large mixing bowl, beat eggs and sugar on high speed until light and fluffy, about 3 minutes. Add melted chocolate mixture, beating until combined.
You can vote once a day till August 11th!
unsound sound
She suddenly rounds on him and asks him how he could talk about her legs and say such horrible things to her child. He snorts at her description of Veda as a “child” and tells her that kid knows a lot more than Mildred thinks she does. Things go waaay off the creepy deep end when Monty calmly says that Veda even asked him how many times he usually screws her mom. And he told her. And he sees nothing wrong with that at all. So, just so we have this clear, a middle-aged man is sitting down with a 14-year-old and discussing in detail the sexual relationship he’s having with this girl’s mother. I’m so horrified watching this scene, I almost don’t know what to do.
"Annie is a good name," I said.
Having qualified fifth, Alesi snatched third from his team-mate Gerhard Berger when the Williams of David Coulthard spun off on lap three. He eased past Damon Hill and on his 31st birthday, looked set for an excellent second place finish. For once, lady luck was shining on Alesi and dominant race leader, Michael Schumacher suffered a gear selection glitch that lost him a full minute. Driving the famous No.27 in Montreal, the number Canadian hero Gilles Villeneuve had in his Ferrari days, Alesi took the chequered flag at his 91st attempt. His Ferrari ran out of fuel on the slowing down lap to complete his lucky day. However after all the bad luck in his career, no-one could deny Jean his deserving moment on the top step of the podium.
And a cup we have …
the Father’s love, old bits of time—
Capital Radio
Palmez is a small family owned winery. It has been said the floors are so clean you can eat off of them. What they said was true. finished and sealed concrete comprises the structure. It’s 18 story, 3 level build is enormous and took 7 years to build even with each level being worked on at the same time.
Hartford Mayor Pedro Segarra, who has vocally endorsed the bill as a solution to some of Hartford’s problems with traffic safety, responded: “I certainly share President Esdaile’s concerns regarding the inequities that exist in terms of the judicial process. That said, honoring the many Hartford families whose lives have been forever changed by people who disregard the law is a greater concern.” Segarra added: “We’re talking about mechanical devices that are being used to implement and enforce laws. I would think that that’s less biased than something that has the human ability to express a bias.”
I hung around for awhile, waving at the people on the floats and taking pictures, but I eventually wanted my beer with the ladies. The only problem was I had to cross the street to get it -- the only way to beer was to swim through the sea of rainbow flags and piles of glitter. I plunged in and immediately got caught up in a group of people who, at that exact moment, decided it was time to jump up and down. I jumped up and down too. I laughed with people I've never met before. I got confetti in my mouth. It was the most fun I've ever had crossing the street.
2008-688 billion Naira
1 premises
Early AAs often said
I have two problems (other than the fact that I'm still working there):
Finished my last big job today. Saw some interesting things on the way, but I'll have to go back for pics. Planning a weekend bicycle camping trip out here soon, so I guess it will have to be then.
Occasional boob soreness (better today than the last few days though) – a general achy, bruise sensation if I mash them. Ahem.
Tonight I attended a Birthday crop for my friend Francine P. Bonne Fête Francine!
In this character he was most generally known as the Wild Huntsman, and when people heard the rush and roar of the wind they cried aloud in superstitious fear, fancying they heard and saw him ride past with his train, all mounted on snorting steeds, and accompanied by baying hounds. And the passing of the Wild Hunt, known as Woden’s Hunt, the Raging Host, Gabriel’s Hounds, or Asgardreia, was also considered a presage of such misfortune as pestilence or war.
So what do you think of this 9mm interview? Have you read Koryta's Lincoln Perry novels? Or his standalones ENVY THE NIGHT or SO COLD THE RIVER? What do you think of his writing? Of the fact he's already achieved so much, and isn't even 30 years old? Thoughts and comments appreciated.
Analysing the editing structure of these slasher films is only part of this paper. Another goal was to outline exploratory data analysis as a data-driven approach to understanding film style that avoids a specific problem of existing ways of thinking about film style.
All I ask of you is to spread the 'word' and if you show one of these on you blog would you kindly link back to the link I am putting in the sidebar.
Stranger things have happened in my dreams but this was more of a vision than just a dream.
5) At least once a week my husband and I have an argument about who is "the funny one" in our relationship. Contrary to what you might think, these arguments are never funny.
i thought painting the two end chairs was going to be a quick and easy project.
And that shall be the day, whene'er it lights,
The cards you hold
I contacted her to see what the dealio was. The pricing was great, she had the colors I wanted but the catch was you had to dig them up youself. UGH!
Level 26: Weapon ATT: +26, Accuracy: +9%, Proc Rate: 58%, Deals 238% damage 2 times.
I find the Japanese cocktail very enjoyable. The combination of the mellow brandy and the nutty, rich orgeat is tremendously extravagant. The bitters here are crucial. Historically the Japanese calls for Boker's, but this is one situation where the presence of aromatic bitters far outweighs the brand choice. It aptly combines sweetness in a inoffensive way, especially in light of its strength--two ounces of brandy is nothing to shake a stick at. After all, it is an early variation of the Old-Fashioned. But no matter how much lipservice I dare give it, the truth is that the Japanese cocktail doesn't get made very much at my house.
Note also that Surprise Exhibit B is considerably larger than a real cockroach and therefore inspires higher decibels. And since Waynerdog repeated this little trick with me, his unsuspecting roomie (because he could), I can attest to the part about highjumping, bosom clutching, and evil banshee shrieking. As a side note, turns out Wayne can scuttle out of a room just as fast as a cockroach.
This adds the disks to a disk group and replaces existing partitions
This one is extremely creepy! I was on the edge of my seat throughout. Be prepared to jump, be terrified and hide behind your sofa while reading this one. Anna Dressed In Blood focuses on ghosts but not just any old ghost; ghosts who tear people limb from limb! A must read whether for Halloween or not.
Change with the ideal of learning at the heart separates “bandwagoneering” and attempts to make substantive differences. It begins with, “How do I make a difference in a real, substantive way?” This requires entering into a dialogue with your heart.
"Many that live deserve death. And some that die deserve life. Can you give it to them? Then do not be too eager to deal out death in judgement. For even the very wise cannot see all ends."
I knew immediately why he was calling: He was calling because it was April Fool's Day, and Clint had set up a friend to make me think I'd won $1000 worth of groceries. So I answered him animatedly, and hopefully not too snidely, "Did I win a thousand dollars!!?"
“Inmate Wiles has been respectful and compliant with staff,” said JoEllen Smith, spokeswoman for the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. “He did have a few brief moments where he became emotional upon his arrival, but his overall demeanor has been the same, which has been respectful, cooperative and compliant with our staff.”
However, underneath the flawed exterior lay the inner-talent that can, justifiably, entitle him to the title of supreme artiste of his generation.
At my first party I miss-calculated just how strong homemade Rakia was, and proceeded to get a little ‘tiddly’. Thinking nothing of it, I returned home only to find two hours later a strange man at my bedroom window, offering ‘Seeeeeex’. Luckily my shocked scream and large dog attempting to remove a vital appendage through the window, saw him rapidly off. But I did learn that night; not to be seen drinking too much (and always sleep with your bedroom window closed.)
Even though I enjoyed the book as a whole, I did have a few problems with it. First of all is the language. Now I'm not a prude and I don't mind swearing in chick lit, but as with Working It Out, I found it to be a bit excessive in this book also and the c-word was used more than once and unnecessarily so as well. I really dislike this word and it lowered the tone for a bit. Also, I felt Amy was very promiscuous, jumping into bed with several men in the book very quickly, and even choosing to sleep with a married man, despite telling herself not to - she seemed to have no self control and I didn't think her promsicuity was necessary for the book. Also there was one scene I felt was in very poor taste, and all I will say is it involves sex and a church. I was horrified when this scene came up, and although I read it, I almost wish I hadn't because it really angered me at the time, and it made me put the book down for a few days. It's a shame that scene was there as the book was fine without it and it really did spoil it in my opinion.
A mother is a person who seeing there are only four pieces of pie for five people, promptly announces she never did care for pie.--Tenneva Jordan
Asked if the implementation of the council would lead to repeal of the Printing Presses and Publications Act 1984 (PPPA), as sought by editors and journalists, the minister was non-committal.
From Romantic poet William Wordsworth to anti-industrial proponent of the Arts and Crafts movement, William Morris, and Pre-Raphaelite painters like John Everett Millais, many artists, despite frequently finding their patronage from those who had made their money in expanding industry, lusted after a rural, anti-modern idealism.
Snared and frightened, Dupic resisted the monk's inhuman strength by attempting to flap his wings and fly away, but the pious pervert was too strong. Determined to reach Cupid, he drew from the reserves deep within his half-soul and dragged the now naked monk with him, closer to his hypnotized brother and Cyberon.
